1 | break (noun): a short rest from work or study | loc: перерва
  EN TS: His "short" break is too long.
  ua TS: Його «коротка» перерва затяглася.
  EN FS: His "short" run is too long.
  ua FS: Його «коротка» пробіжка затяглася.
  EN TP: a short phone break
  ua TP: коротка перерва з телефоном
  EN FP: a short coffee break
  ua FP: коротка перерва на каву
2 | certificate (noun): official proof that you finished a course | loc: сертифікат
  EN TS: She has so many certificates!
  ua TS: У неї стільки сертифікатів!
  EN FS: She has so many medals!
  ua FS: У неї стільки медалей!
  EN TP: showing her certificates
  ua TP: показує свої сертифікати
  EN FP: printing her certificates
  ua FP: друкує свої сертифікати
3 | class (noun): teaching given as a series of lessons | loc: клас
  EN TS: Her class is crazy!
  ua TS: Її клас — повний хаос!
  EN FS: Her class is sleeping!
  ua FS: Її клас спить!
  EN TP: a class out of control
  ua TP: клас, що вийшов з-під контролю
  EN FP: a class trip abroad
  ua FP: поїздка класу за кордон
4 | course (noun): a series of lessons on one subject | loc: курс
  EN TS: She has an online course.
  ua TS: У неї онлайн-курс.
  EN FS: She has an online meeting.
  ua FS: У неї онлайн-зустріч.
  EN TP: an online course at home
  ua TP: онлайн-курс удома
  EN FP: a cooking course at school
  ua FP: кулінарний курс у школі
6 | cushion (noun): a soft pillow-like pad you sit or lean on | loc: подушка
  EN TS: One cushion is not enough.
  ua TS: Однієї подушки замало.
  EN FS: One chair is not enough.
  ua FS: Одного стільця замало.
  EN TP: a pile of cushions
  ua TP: гора подушок
  EN FP: a pile of blankets
  ua FP: гора ковдр
7 | graduation (noun): the ceremony where you receive your diploma | loc: випускний
  EN TS: It is his graduation day.
  ua TS: Сьогодні в нього випускний.
  EN FS: It is her graduation day.
  ua FS: Сьогодні в неї випускний.
  EN TP: a graduation ceremony
  ua TP: випускна церемонія
  EN FP: a graduation present
  ua FP: подарунок на випускний
8 | keycard (noun): a plastic card that unlocks an electronic lock | loc: ключ-карта
  EN TS: She blamed the keycard. Wrong door.
  ua TS: Вона звинуватила ключ-карту. Двері не ті.
  EN FS: She blamed the suitcase. Wrong door.
  ua FS: Вона звинуватила валізу. Двері не ті.
  EN TP: tapping the keycard
  ua TP: прикладає ключ-карту
  EN FP: losing the keycard
  ua FP: губить ключ-карту
9 | laboratory (noun): a room with equipment for doing experiments | loc: лабораторія
  EN TS: This is a busy laboratory.
  ua TS: Це жвава лабораторія.
  EN FS: This is a busy kitchen.
  ua FS: Це жвава кухня.
  EN TP: working in a laboratory
  ua TP: працює в лабораторії
  EN FP: cleaning a laboratory
  ua FP: прибирає лабораторію
10 | leaf (noun): one of the flat green parts growing on a tree | loc: листок
  EN TS: A leaf is a free umbrella!
  ua TS: Листок — це безкоштовна парасолька!
  EN FS: A leaf is a free blanket!
  ua FS: Листок — це безкоштовна ковдра!
  EN TP: a giant green leaf
  ua TP: гігантський зелений листок
  EN FP: a giant green frog
  ua FP: гігантська зелена жаба
11 | library (noun): a place full of books you can read or borrow | loc: бібліотека
  EN TS: This library is huge!
  ua TS: Ця бібліотека величезна!
  EN FS: This library is tiny!
  ua FS: Ця бібліотека крихітна!
  EN TP: a huge old library
  ua TP: величезна стара бібліотека
  EN FP: a small school library
  ua FP: маленька шкільна бібліотека
13 | napkin (noun): a piece of cloth or paper to wipe your mouth | loc: серветка
  EN TS: Her napkin is a work of art!
  ua TS: Її серветка — справжній витвір мистецтва!
  EN FS: Her cake is a work of art!
  ua FS: Її торт — справжній витвір мистецтва!
  EN TP: folding a napkin
  ua TP: складає серветку
  EN FP: a napkin on the floor
  ua FP: серветка на підлозі
14 | page (noun): one side of a sheet of paper in a book | loc: сторінка
  EN TS: A flower is going on the page.
  ua TS: На сторінку кладуть квітку.
  EN FS: A photo is going on the page.
  ua FS: На сторінку кладуть фото.
  EN TP: a page with flowers
  ua TP: сторінка з квітами
  EN FP: a page in a newspaper
  ua FP: сторінка в газеті
15 | pill (noun): a small round medicine that you swallow | loc: таблетка
  EN TS: One pill and he is fine.
  ua TS: Одна таблетка — і він у нормі.
  EN FS: One coffee and he is fine.
  ua FS: Одна кава — і він у нормі.
  EN TP: swallowing a white pill
  ua TP: ковтає білу таблетку
  EN FP: a pill for sleeping
  ua FP: таблетка для сну
16 | presentation (noun): a talk where you show your work to a group | loc: презентація
  EN TS: She is giving a presentation.
  ua TS: Вона проводить презентацію.
  EN FS: She is giving a concert.
  ua FS: Вона дає концерт.
  EN TP: giving a presentation
  ua TP: проводить презентацію
  EN FP: watching a presentation
  ua FP: дивиться презентацію
17 | project (noun): a planned piece of work that takes time | loc: проєкт
  EN TS: The project: one wooden shed.
  ua TS: Проєкт: один дерев'яний сарай.
  EN FS: The project: one wooden boat.
  ua FS: Проєкт: один дерев'яний човен.
  EN TP: a big shed project
  ua TP: великий проєкт сараю
  EN FP: a school project on paper
  ua FP: шкільний проєкт на папері
18 | root (noun): the part of a plant that grows under the ground | loc: корінь
  EN TS: She is washing the roots.
  ua TS: Вона миє коріння.
  EN FS: She is cutting the roots.
  ua FS: Вона обрізає коріння.
  EN TP: rinsing the roots
  ua TP: промиває коріння
  EN FP: roots of a big tree
  ua FP: коріння великого дерева
19 | ruler (noun): a flat stick for measuring and drawing lines | loc: лінійка
  EN TS: He found a ruler at last!
  ua TS: Він нарешті знайшов лінійку!
  EN FS: He found a pencil at last!
  ua FS: Він нарешті знайшов олівець!
  EN TP: drawing with a ruler
  ua TP: креслить лінійкою
  EN FP: drawing with a compass
  ua FP: креслить циркулем
20 | schedule (noun): a plan of the things you must do and when | loc: розклад
  EN TS: Full schedule, but sleep wins!
  ua TS: Розклад забитий, але сон перемагає!
  EN FS: Full schedule, but work wins!
  ua FS: Розклад забитий, але робота перемагає!
  EN TP: a full schedule
  ua TP: забитий розклад
  EN FP: a bus schedule
  ua FP: розклад автобусів
21 | school (noun): a place where children go to learn | loc: школа
  EN TS: Welcome to my school, bro.
  ua TS: Ласкаво просимо до моєї школи, бро.
  EN FS: Welcome to my office, bro.
  ua FS: Ласкаво просимо до мого офісу, бро.
  EN TP: a tour of my school
  ua TP: екскурсія моєю школою
  EN FP: a tour of my office
  ua FP: екскурсія моїм офісом
22 | scientist (noun): a person who studies nature and does experiments | loc: науковець
  EN TS: The scientist loves charts.
  ua TS: Науковець обожнює графіки.
  EN FS: The student loves charts.
  ua FS: Студент обожнює графіки.
  EN TP: a scientist with a clipboard
  ua TP: науковець із планшеткою
  EN FP: a scientist with a microscope
  ua FP: науковець із мікроскопом
23 | speech (noun): a formal talk given to an audience | loc: промова
  EN TS: She is giving a formal speech.
  ua TS: Вона виголошує офіційну промову.
  EN FS: She is giving a short concert.
  ua FS: Вона дає короткий концерт.
  EN TP: a heartfelt speech
  ua TP: щира промова
  EN FP: a speech bubble
  ua FP: бульбашка з реплікою
24 | spoon (noun): a tool with a small bowl for eating liquid food | loc: ложка
  EN TS: Her spoon emptied the whole bowl!
  ua TS: Її ложка спустошила всю миску!
  EN FS: Her fork emptied the whole bowl!
  ua FS: Її виделка спустошила всю миску!
  EN TP: a spoon full of soup
  ua TP: повна ложка супу
  EN FP: a spoon full of sugar
  ua FP: повна ложка цукру
25 | stapler (noun): a tool that joins papers with small metal clips | loc: степлер
  EN TS: His stapler never gives up!
  ua TS: Його степлер ніколи не здається!
  EN FS: His printer never gives up!
  ua FS: Його принтер ніколи не здається!
  EN TP: a red stapler
  ua TP: червоний степлер
  EN FP: a broken stapler
  ua FP: зламаний степлер
26 | straw (noun): a thin tube you drink through | loc: трубочка
  EN TS: His straw works super fast!
  ua TS: Його трубочка працює на максималках!
  EN FS: His spoon works super fast!
  ua FS: Його ложка працює на максималках!
  EN TP: a striped bendy straw
  ua TP: смугаста трубочка з гармошкою
  EN FP: a straw sun hat
  ua FP: солом'яний капелюх від сонця
27 | student (noun): a person who learns at a school or college | loc: студент
  EN TS: This student ices her coffee.
  ua TS: Ця студентка охолоджує каву льодом.
  EN FS: This student heats her coffee.
  ua FS: Ця студентка підігріває каву.
  EN TP: a student with cold coffee
  ua TP: студентка з холодною кавою
  EN FP: a student with hot soup
  ua FP: студентка з гарячим супом
28 | subject (noun): a thing you learn at school, like maths | loc: предмет
  EN TS: School offers many subjects.
  ua TS: У школі багато предметів.
  EN FS: School offers two subjects.
  ua FS: У школі два предмети.
  EN TP: many school subjects
  ua TP: багато шкільних предметів
  EN FP: the subject of an email
  ua FP: тема електронного листа
29 | telescope (noun): a tube with lenses for seeing far things | loc: телескоп
  EN TS: Her telescope shows a meteor!
  ua TS: Її телескоп показує метеор!
  EN FS: Her telescope shows a rocket!
  ua FS: Її телескоп показує ракету!
  EN TP: a telescope on a tripod
  ua TP: телескоп на штативі
  EN FP: a telescope on a ship
  ua FP: телескоп на кораблі
30 | textbook (noun): a book used for learning a school subject | loc: підручник
  EN TS: This textbook never ends.
  ua TS: Цей підручник ніколи не закінчиться.
  EN FS: This movie never ends.
  ua FS: Цей фільм ніколи не закінчиться.
  EN TP: a very thick textbook
  ua TP: дуже товстий підручник
  EN FP: a very thin textbook
  ua FP: дуже тонкий підручник
31 | university (noun): a place to study for a degree after school | loc: університет
  EN TS: Week five: the university is empty.
  ua TS: П'ятий тиждень: університет порожній.
  EN FS: Week five: the university is full.
  ua FS: П'ятий тиждень: університет повний.
  EN TP: an empty university hall
  ua TP: порожня зала університету
  EN FP: an empty university library
  ua FP: порожня бібліотека університету
32 | word (noun): a group of letters that has a meaning | loc: слово
  EN TS: They are playing a word game.
  ua TS: Вони грають у гру в слова.
  EN FS: They are playing a card game.
  ua FS: Вони грають у карткову гру.
  EN TP: a fast word game
  ua TP: швидка гра в слова
  EN FP: a fast card game
  ua FP: швидка гра в карти
33 | ache (noun): a continuous dull pain, like in a tooth | loc: біль
  EN TS: Coffee makes the ache worse!
  ua TS: Від кави біль тільки сильніший!
  EN FS: Ice makes the ache worse!
  ua FS: Від льоду біль тільки сильніший!
  EN TP: an ache in the jaw
  ua TP: біль у щелепі
  EN FP: an ache in the back
  ua FP: біль у спині
34 | activity (noun): something you do for fun or exercise | loc: активність
  EN TS: Badminton: a great activity.
  ua TS: Бадмінтон — чудова активність.
  EN FS: Tennis: a great activity.
  ua FS: Теніс — чудова активність.
  EN TP: an afternoon activity outside
  ua TP: активність надворі після обіду
  EN FP: an activity for rainy days
  ua FP: активність на дощовий день
35 | actor (noun): a man who plays roles in films or plays | loc: актор
  EN TS: The actor deserves an Oscar!
  ua TS: Цей актор заслуговує на «Оскар»!
  EN FS: The singer deserves an Oscar!
  ua FS: Цей співак заслуговує на «Оскар»!
  EN TP: an actor on set
  ua TP: актор на знімальному майданчику
  EN FP: an actor on a poster
  ua FP: актор на постері
36 | adore (verb): to love someone or something very much | loc: обожнювати
  EN TS: She adores this cat so much!
  ua TS: Вона так обожнює цього кота!
  EN FS: She adores this dog so much!
  ua FS: Вона так обожнює цього пса!
  EN TP: adoring her orange cat
  ua TP: обожнює свого рудого кота
  EN FP: adoring her orange dog
  ua FP: обожнює свого рудого пса
37 | advance (verb): to move forward towards a goal | loc: просуватися
  EN TS: The team is advancing to the goal.
  ua TS: Команда просувається до мети.
  EN FS: The team is advancing to the hut.
  ua FS: Команда просувається до хатини.
  EN TP: advancing to the summit
  ua TP: просуваються до вершини
  EN FP: advancing to the final
  ua FP: просуваються до фіналу
38 | airport (noun): a place where planes take off and land | loc: аеропорт
  EN TS: Heavy traffic at the airport today.
  ua TS: Сьогодні в аеропорту жвавий рух.
  EN FS: No traffic at the airport today.
  ua FS: Сьогодні в аеропорту жодного руху.
  EN TP: a busy airport runway
  ua TP: жвава злітна смуга аеропорту
  EN FP: an airport shop
  ua FP: магазин в аеропорту
39 | ambulance (noun): a vehicle that takes sick people to hospital | loc: швидка
  EN TS: An ambulance is pulling over.
  ua TS: Швидка зупиняється на узбіччі.
  EN FS: A taxi is pulling over.
  ua FS: Таксі зупиняється на узбіччі.
  EN TP: an ambulance on a street
  ua TP: швидка на вулиці
  EN FP: an ambulance on a motorway
  ua FP: швидка на автомагістралі
40 | answer (noun): what you say or write back to a question | loc: відповідь
  EN TS: She hates the answer.
  ua TS: Вона ненавидить цю відповідь.
  EN FS: She loves the answer.
  ua FS: Вона обожнює цю відповідь.
  EN TP: an answer from a card
  ua TP: відповідь із картки
  EN FP: an answer from a friend
  ua FP: відповідь від друга
41 | argument (noun): an angry talk where people disagree | loc: сварка
  EN TS: Just a small argument.
  ua TS: Просто маленька сварка.
  EN FS: Just a small kiss.
  ua FS: Просто маленький поцілунок.
  EN TP: an argument about a picture
  ua TP: сварка через картину
  EN FP: an argument about money
  ua FP: сварка через гроші
42 | exam (noun): a test of what you know at school | loc: іспит
  EN TS: This exam is too hard for him.
  ua TS: Цей іспит для нього заважкий.
  EN FS: This exam is too easy for him.
  ua FS: Цей іспит для нього залегкий.
  EN TP: giving up on the exam
  ua TP: опускає руки на іспиті
  EN FP: passing the exam
  ua FP: складає іспит
44 | anger (noun): the strong feeling of being annoyed or furious | loc: гнів
  EN TS: So much anger over a bag of flowers!
  ua TS: Стільки гніву через пакет квітів!
  EN FS: So much anger over a bag of apples!
  ua FS: Стільки гніву через пакет яблук!
  EN TP: anger at the flower market
  ua TP: гнів на квітковому ринку
  EN FP: anger at a traffic jam
  ua FP: гнів у заторі
45 | angry (adjective): feeling very mad and upset with someone | loc: сердитий
  EN TS: She is angry at the man!
  ua TS: Вона сердита на чоловіка!
  EN FS: She is angry at the dog!
  ua FS: Вона сердита на собаку!
  EN TP: an angry woman
  ua TP: сердита жінка
  EN FP: angry about the rain
  ua FP: сердита через дощ
46 | apple (noun): a round fruit with red or green skin | loc: яблуко
  EN TS: That apple looks so crispy!
  ua TS: Це яблуко виглядає таким хрустким!
  EN FS: That pear looks so crispy!
  ua FS: Ця груша виглядає такою хрусткою!
  EN TP: biting a red apple
  ua TP: кусає червоне яблуко
  EN FP: baking an apple pie
  ua FP: пече яблучний пиріг
47 | arena (noun): a big indoor hall with seats around a court | loc: арена
  EN TS: The arena is packed. Insane!
  ua TS: Арена забита вщент. Божевілля!
  EN FS: The arena is empty. Insane!
  ua FS: Арена порожня. Божевілля!
  EN TP: a packed indoor arena
  ua TP: забита крита арена
  EN FP: an empty indoor arena
  ua FP: порожня крита арена
48 | arrive (verb): to reach a place at the end of a trip | loc: приїхати
  EN TS: He arrived and he is so happy!
  ua TS: Він приїхав і такий щасливий!
  EN FS: He arrived and he is so sad!
  ua FS: Він приїхав і такий сумний!
  EN TP: arriving at a beach hotel
  ua TP: приїжджає до пляжного готелю
  EN FP: arriving at the office
  ua FP: приїжджає в офіс
49 | arrow (noun): the thin feathered stick you shoot from a bow | loc: стріла
  EN TS: Her arrow hit the bullseye.
  ua TS: Її стріла влучила в яблучко.
  EN FS: Her arrow hit the tree.
  ua FS: Її стріла влучила в дерево.
  EN TP: an arrow in the bullseye
  ua TP: стріла в яблучку
  EN FP: an arrow on the sign
  ua FP: стрілка на вказівнику
50 | jar (noun): a small glass pot with a lid | loc: баночка
  EN TS: The jars look like cake!
  ua TS: Баночки схожі на торт!
  EN FS: The jars look like soup!
  ua FS: Баночки схожі на суп!
  EN TP: filling small glass jars
  ua TP: наповнює маленькі скляні баночки
  EN FP: opening small glass jars
  ua FP: відкриває маленькі скляні баночки
51 | squeeze (verb): to press something firmly together with your hand | loc: стискати
  EN TS: Squeezing slime is so satisfying.
  ua TS: Стискати слайм — це такий кайф.
  EN FS: Squeezing clay is so satisfying.
  ua FS: Стискати глину — це такий кайф.
  EN TP: squeezing colorful slime
  ua TP: стискає кольоровий слайм
  EN FP: squeezing a lemon
  ua FP: стискає лимон
52 | assistant (noun): a person whose job is to help someone | loc: асистент
  EN TS: The assistant does everything.
  ua TS: Асистент робить усе.
  EN FS: The model does everything.
  ua FS: Модель робить усе.
  EN TP: a helpful assistant
  ua TP: корисний асистент
  EN FP: a shop assistant
  ua FP: продавець-консультант
53 | athletics (noun): track-and-field sports like running and jumping | loc: легка атлетика
  EN TS: This is athletics at its best.
  ua TS: Це легка атлетика в найкращому вигляді.
  EN FS: This is swimming at its best.
  ua FS: Це плавання в найкращому вигляді.
  EN TP: athletics at a stadium
  ua TP: легка атлетика на стадіоні
  EN FP: athletics on television
  ua FP: легка атлетика по телевізору
54 | atm (noun): the machine in the street that gives you cash | loc: банкомат
  EN TS: ATM cash for sunflowers!
  ua TS: Готівка з банкомата — на соняшники!
  EN FS: ATM cash for pizza!
  ua FS: Готівка з банкомата — на піцу!
  EN TP: taking cash from an ATM
  ua TP: знімає готівку з банкомата
  EN FP: an ATM keeping her card
  ua FP: банкомат ковтає її картку
55 | auction (noun): a public sale where the highest bidder wins | loc: аукціон
  EN TS: She won the auction.
  ua TS: Вона виграла аукціон.
  EN FS: She lost the auction.
  ua FS: Вона програла аукціон.
  EN TP: bidding at an auction
  ua TP: торгується на аукціоні
  EN FP: an auction on the internet
  ua FP: аукціон в інтернеті
56 | autumn (noun): the season after summer when leaves fall | loc: осінь
  EN TS: Autumn leaves everywhere!
  ua TS: Осінь: листя всюди!
  EN FS: Autumn snow everywhere!
  ua FS: Осінь: сніг усюди!
  EN TP: jumping into autumn leaves
  ua TP: стрибає в осіннє листя
  EN FP: autumn leaves on a tree
  ua FP: осіннє листя на дереві
57 | back (noun): the part of a place farthest from the front | loc: задня частина
  EN TS: They love the back row!
  ua TS: Вони обожнюють задню частину залу!
  EN FS: They love the front row!
  ua FS: Вони обожнюють передню частину залу!
  EN TP: sitting at the back
  ua TP: сидять у задній частині
  EN FP: the back of the stage
  ua FP: задня частина сцени
58 | backpack (noun): a bag with two straps you wear on your shoulders | loc: рюкзак
  EN TS: Her backpack is huge, no joke.
  ua TS: Її рюкзак величезний, без жартів.
  EN FS: Her suitcase is huge, no joke.
  ua FS: Її валіза величезна, без жартів.
  EN TP: packing an orange backpack
  ua TP: пакує помаранчевий рюкзак
  EN FP: a backpack at school
  ua FP: рюкзак у школі
61 | backward (adverb): in the direction behind you | loc: назад
  EN TS: Why are they walking backward?
  ua TS: Чому вони крокують назад?
  EN FS: Why are they running backward?
  ua FS: Чому вони біжать назад?
  EN TP: walking backward in a park
  ua TP: крокують назад у парку
  EN FP: falling backward in a park
  ua FP: падають назад у парку
62 | bag (noun): a soft container you carry things in | loc: сумка
  EN TS: The apple escaped the bag!
  ua TS: Яблуко втекло із сумки!
  EN FS: The bread escaped the bag!
  ua FS: Хліб утік із сумки!
  EN TP: packing a picnic bag
  ua TP: пакує сумку для пікніка
  EN FP: a plastic shopping bag
  ua FP: пластиковий пакет для покупок
65 | baking sheet (noun): the flat metal tray you bake food on in the oven | loc: деко
  EN TS: Veggies on a baking sheet.
  ua TS: Овочі на деку.
  EN FS: Cookies on a baking sheet.
  ua FS: Печиво на деку.
  EN TP: veggies on a baking sheet
  ua TP: овочі на деку
  EN FP: cookies on a baking sheet
  ua FP: печиво на деку
66 | baking (noun): cooking bread or cake in an oven | loc: випікання
  EN TS: They are baking bread.
  ua TS: Вони зайняті випіканням хліба.
  EN FS: They are baking a cake.
  ua FS: Вони зайняті випіканням торта.
  EN TP: baking a golden loaf
  ua TP: випікання золотистої хлібини
  EN FP: baking cookies
  ua FP: випікання печива
67 | banana (noun): a long curved yellow fruit you peel | loc: банан
  EN TS: He learned a new banana trick.
  ua TS: Він вивчив новий трюк із бананом.
  EN FS: He learned a new apple trick.
  ua FS: Він вивчив новий трюк з яблуком.
  EN TP: peeling a banana
  ua TP: чистить банан
  EN FP: a banana in a smoothie
  ua FP: банан у смузі
68 | bandage (noun): a strip of soft cloth wrapped around a wound | loc: бинт
  EN TS: A bandage for her wrist.
  ua TS: Бинт для її зап'ястя.
  EN FS: A bandage for her knee.
  ua FS: Бинт для її коліна.
  EN TP: an elastic wrist bandage
  ua TP: еластичний бинт на зап'ясті
  EN FP: a bandage on the head
  ua FP: бинт на голові
69 | barbell (noun): the long metal bar with heavy plates on both ends | loc: штанга
  EN TS: The barbell lost. She won!
  ua TS: Штанга програла. Вона перемогла!
  EN FS: The barbell won. She lost!
  ua FS: Штанга перемогла. Вона програла!
  EN TP: deadlifting a heavy barbell
  ua TP: станова тяга з важкою штангою
  EN FP: bending a heavy barbell
  ua FP: гне важку штангу
70 | barber (noun): a person who cuts men's hair and beards | loc: перукар
  EN TS: This barber is a legend!
  ua TS: Цей перукар — легенда!
  EN FS: This baker is a legend!
  ua FS: Цей пекар — легенда!
  EN TP: a barber trimming a beard
  ua TP: перукар підрівнює бороду
  EN FP: a barber sweeping the floor
  ua FP: перукар підмітає підлогу
71 | bark (noun): the rough outer skin of a tree trunk | loc: кора
  EN TS: Birch bark is like paper.
  ua TS: Березова кора — як папір.
  EN FS: Pine bark is like paper.
  ua FS: Соснова кора — як папір.
  EN TP: peeling birch bark
  ua TP: здирає березову кору
  EN FP: a dog's loud bark
  ua FP: гучний гавкіт собаки
72 | basketball (noun): a team game of throwing a ball through a hoop | loc: баскетбол
  EN TS: Basketball queen, what a dunk!
  ua TS: Королева баскетболу, оце данк!
  EN FS: Basketball queen, what a miss!
  ua FS: Королева баскетболу, оце промах!
  EN TP: a basketball dunk
  ua TP: данк у баскетболі
  EN FP: basketball on television
  ua FP: баскетбол по телевізору
74 | bat (noun): a small flying animal that hangs upside down | loc: кажан
  EN TS: A bat is flying over the lake.
  ua TS: Кажан летить над озером.
  EN FS: A bat is flying over the city.
  ua FS: Кажан летить над містом.
  EN TP: a bat flying at sunset
  ua TP: кажан летить на заході сонця
  EN FP: a bat hitting a ball
  ua FP: бита б'є по м'ячу
75 | flap (verb): to move wings up and down quickly to fly | loc: махати крилами
  EN TS: Dude, the bats are flapping.
  ua TS: Чувак, кажани махають крилами.
  EN FS: Dude, the birds are flapping.
  ua FS: Чувак, птахи махають крилами.
  EN TP: flapping big wings
  ua TP: махає великими крилами
  EN FP: flapping on the cave floor
  ua FP: махає крилами на дні печери
76 | battery (noun): a small object that stores power for devices | loc: батарейка
  EN TS: Blame the old batteries.
  ua TS: Звинувачуй старі батарейки.
  EN FS: Blame the old bulb.
  ua FS: Звинувачуй стару лампочку.
  EN TP: loading new batteries
  ua TP: вставляє нові батарейки
  EN FP: a battery for a car
  ua FP: акумулятор для машини
78 | beach (noun): an area of sand or stones next to the sea | loc: пляж
  EN TS: The sea took their castle on the beach.
  ua TS: Море забрало їхній замок на пляжі.
  EN FS: A dog took their castle on the beach.
  ua FS: Собака забрав їхній замок на пляжі.
  EN TP: a sandcastle on the beach
  ua TP: піщаний замок на пляжі
  EN FP: a beach full of stones
  ua FP: кам'янистий пляж
79 | bear (noun): a large heavy wild animal with thick fur | loc: ведмідь
  EN TS: The bear is chasing a fish!
  ua TS: Ведмідь женеться за рибою!
  EN FS: The bear is chasing a duck!
  ua FS: Ведмідь женеться за качкою!
  EN TP: a bear in a river
  ua TP: ведмідь у річці
  EN FP: a bear in a zoo
  ua FP: ведмідь у зоопарку
80 | beard (noun): hair that grows on a man's chin and cheeks | loc: борода
  EN TS: Ten years to grow that beard!
  ua TS: Десять років, щоб відростити таку бороду!
  EN FS: Ten days to grow that beard!
  ua FS: Десять днів, щоб відростити таку бороду!
  EN TP: a long black beard
  ua TP: довга чорна борода
  EN FP: a short grey beard
  ua FP: коротка сива борода
81 | beauty (noun): the quality of being very pleasing to look at | loc: краса
  EN TS: Pure beauty in Santorini.
  ua TS: Чиста краса на Санторині.
  EN FS: Pure beauty in Venice.
  ua FS: Чиста краса у Венеції.
  EN TP: the beauty of the sunset
  ua TP: краса заходу сонця
  EN FP: a beauty salon in town
  ua FP: салон краси в місті
82 | bee (noun): a flying insect that makes honey and can sting | loc: бджола
  EN TS: The bee is going back to work.
  ua TS: Бджола повертається на роботу.
  EN FS: The ant is going back to work.
  ua FS: Мураха повертається на роботу.
  EN TP: a bee on a flower
  ua TP: бджола на квітці
  EN FP: a bee in a jar
  ua FP: бджола в банці
83 | beer (noun): an alcoholic drink made from grain | loc: пиво
  EN TS: The beer foam is top quality.
  ua TS: Пінка на пиві — вищий ґатунок.
  EN FS: The milk foam is top quality.
  ua FS: Пінка на молоці — вищий ґатунок.
  EN TP: pouring a golden beer
  ua TP: наливає золотисте пиво
  EN FP: beer at a football match
  ua FP: пиво на футбольному матчі
84 | belt (noun): a strap you wear around your waist | loc: ремінь
  EN TS: The belt saved his trousers!
  ua TS: Ремінь урятував його штани!
  EN FS: The rope saved his trousers!
  ua FS: Мотузка врятувала його штани!
  EN TP: putting on a leather belt
  ua TP: застібає шкіряний ремінь
  EN FP: taking off a leather belt
  ua FP: знімає шкіряний ремінь
85 | betray (verb): to break someone's trust after promising help | loc: зраджувати | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The kid betrayed him!
  ua TS: Малий його зрадив!
  EN FS: The dog betrayed him!
  ua FS: Пес його зрадив!
  EN TP: a betrayed farmer
  ua TP: зраджений фермер
  EN FP: a betrayed kid
  ua FP: зраджений малий
86 | bill (noun): the paper that says what you pay in a restaurant | loc: рахунок
  EN TS: That bill is way too long!
  ua TS: Цей рахунок надто довгий!
  EN FS: That bill is way too short!
  ua FS: Цей рахунок надто короткий!
  EN TP: a very long bill
  ua TP: дуже довгий рахунок
  EN FP: a bill in a wallet
  ua FP: рахунок у гаманці
87 | bird (noun): an animal with feathers and wings | loc: птах
  EN TS: The bird is giving a concert!
  ua TS: Птах дає концерт!
  EN FS: The cat is giving a concert!
  ua FS: Кіт дає концерт!
  EN TP: a bird singing loudly
  ua TP: птах голосно співає
  EN FP: a bird in a cage
  ua FP: птах у клітці
88 | dog (noun): an animal kept as a pet that barks | loc: собака
  EN TS: The dog wants a selfie.
  ua TS: Собака хоче селфі.
  EN FS: The cat wants a selfie.
  ua FS: Кішка хоче селфі.
  EN TP: a dog near the camera
  ua TP: собака біля камери
  EN FP: a dog near the door
  ua FP: собака біля дверей
89 | cat (noun): a small furry pet that says meow | loc: кішка
  EN TS: The black cat is jumping off.
  ua TS: Чорна кішка стрибає вниз.
  EN FS: The tabby cat is jumping off.
  ua FS: Смугаста кішка стрибає вниз.
  EN TP: a cat on a tower
  ua TP: кішка на котячій вежі
  EN FP: a cat under a tower
  ua FP: кішка під котячою вежею
90 | puppy (noun): a young dog | loc: цуценя
  EN TS: Wait, puppies can dance?!
  ua TS: Стоп, цуценята вміють танцювати?!
  EN FS: Wait, puppies can fly?!
  ua FS: Стоп, цуценята вміють літати?!
  EN TP: a puppy in the bath
  ua TP: цуценя у ванні
  EN FP: a puppy in the snow
  ua FP: цуценя в снігу
91 | blame (verb): to say someone is responsible for something bad | loc: звинувачувати
  EN TS: Mum is blaming the boy. The cat did it.
  ua TS: Мама звинувачує хлопця. А це був кіт.
  EN FS: Mum is blaming the boy. The dog did it.
  ua FS: Мама звинувачує хлопця. А це був пес.
  EN TP: to blame the cat
  ua TP: звинувачувати кота
  EN FP: to blame the weather
  ua FP: звинувачувати погоду
92 | blanket (noun): a large warm cover for a bed | loc: ковдра
  EN TS: One blanket, two people.
  ua TS: Одна ковдра, двоє людей.
  EN FS: One blanket, three people.
  ua FS: Одна ковдра, троє людей.
  EN TP: sharing a big blanket
  ua TP: ділять велику ковдру
  EN FP: sharing a big pizza
  ua FP: ділять велику піцу
93 | blender (noun): the machine whose blades mix food into a drink | loc: блендер
  EN TS: The blender did it!
  ua TS: Це все блендер!
  EN FS: The toaster did it!
  ua FS: Це все тостер!
  EN TP: a smoothie in a blender
  ua TP: смузі в блендері
  EN FP: a blender full of soup
  ua FP: блендер, повний супу
94 | blink (verb): to quickly close and open your eyes | loc: моргати | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He blinked first. She won!
  ua TS: Він моргнув першим. Вона виграла!
  EN FS: She blinked first. He won!
  ua FS: Вона моргнула першою. Він виграв!
  EN TP: blinking first
  ua TP: моргнути першим
  EN FP: blinking at the sun
  ua FP: моргати від сонця
95 | blush (noun): the pink face powder you brush onto your cheeks | loc: рум'яна
  EN TS: She is putting on pink blush.
  ua TS: Вона наносить рожеві рум'яна.
  EN FS: She is putting on blue blush.
  ua FS: Вона наносить сині рум'яна.
  EN TP: sweeping on pink blush
  ua TP: наносить рожеві рум'яна
  EN FP: blushing from shame
  ua FP: червоніє від сорому
96 | board (verb): to get on a plane, ship or train as a passenger | loc: сідати
  EN TS: She is boarding the plane.
  ua TS: Вона сідає в літак.
  EN FS: She is boarding the train.
  ua FS: Вона сідає в поїзд.
  EN TP: boarding the plane
  ua TP: сідає в літак
  EN FP: boarding the bus
  ua FP: сідає в автобус
97 | boil (verb): to heat a liquid until it bubbles | loc: кипіти | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The water is boiling.
  ua TS: Вода кипить.
  EN FS: The milk is boiling.
  ua FS: Молоко кипить.
  EN TP: water at a rolling boil
  ua TP: вода бурхливо кипить
  EN FP: milk at a rolling boil
  ua FP: молоко бурхливо кипить
98 | hammock (noun): a hanging bed of cloth or net you lie in | loc: гамак
  EN TS: She is reading in a hammock.
  ua TS: Вона читає в гамаку.
  EN FS: She is sleeping in a hammock.
  ua FS: Вона спить у гамаку.
  EN TP: reading in a hammock
  ua TP: читає в гамаку
  EN FP: sleeping in a hammock
  ua FP: спить у гамаку
99 | book (noun): a set of printed pages inside a cover to read | loc: книга
  EN TS: She finished the whole book!
  ua TS: Вона дочитала всю книгу!
  EN FS: She finished the whole cake!
  ua FS: Вона доїла весь торт!
  EN TP: reading a green book
  ua TP: читає зелену книгу
  EN FP: a book on a train
  ua FP: книга в поїзді
100 | boots (noun): strong shoes that cover your ankle or leg | loc: чоботи
  EN TS: These boots love mud.
  ua TS: Ці чоботи обожнюють багнюку.
  EN FS: These sandals love mud.
  ua FS: Ці сандалі обожнюють багнюку.
  EN TP: boots in the mud
  ua TP: чоботи в багнюці
  EN FP: boots in a shop
  ua FP: чоботи в магазині
101 | bored (adjective): tired and unhappy because nothing is fun | loc: знуджений
  EN TS: Ugh. She is so bored.
  ua TS: Ох. Вона така знуджена.
  EN FS: Ugh. He is so bored.
  ua FS: Ох. Він такий знуджений.
  EN TP: bored of waiting
  ua TP: знуджена від чекання
  EN FP: bored at a party
  ua FP: знуджена на вечірці
102 | boredom (noun): the feeling of having nothing interesting to do | loc: нудьга
  EN TS: Boredom level: a wet sock on his head.
  ua TS: Рівень нудьги: мокра шкарпетка на голові.
  EN FS: Boredom level: a wet hat on his head.
  ua FS: Рівень нудьги: мокра шапка на голові.
  EN TP: boredom in a laundromat
  ua TP: нудьга в пральні
  EN FP: boredom in a classroom
  ua FP: нудьга в класі
103 | laundromat (noun): a shop of washing machines you pay to use | loc: пральня
  EN TS: Night at the laundromat. Ugh!
  ua TS: Ніч у пральні. Ох!
  EN FS: Night at the library. Ugh!
  ua FS: Ніч у бібліотеці. Ох!
  EN TP: waiting at a laundromat
  ua TP: чекає в пральні
  EN FP: working at a laundromat
  ua FP: працює в пральні
104 | bottom (noun): the ground under the sea, a lake or a river | loc: дно | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: A stone from the sea bottom!
  ua TS: Камінь із морського дна!
  EN FS: A shell from the sea bottom!
  ua FS: Мушля з морського дна!
  EN TP: a stone from the bottom
  ua TP: камінь із дна
  EN FP: the bottom of a glass
  ua FP: дно склянки
105 | bow (noun): a curved weapon with a string that shoots arrows | loc: лук
  EN TS: Her bow never misses.
  ua TS: Її лук ніколи не схибить.
  EN FS: Her bow always misses.
  ua FS: Її лук завжди хибить.
  EN TP: drawing a wooden bow
  ua TP: натягує дерев'яний лук
  EN FP: a bow and a sword
  ua FP: лук і меч
106 | aim (verb): to point a weapon carefully at your target | loc: цілитися
  EN TS: He is aiming at the hay bale.
  ua TS: Він цілиться в тюк сіна.
  EN FS: He is aiming at a tree.
  ua FS: Він цілиться в дерево.
  EN TP: aiming a bamboo bow
  ua TP: цілиться з бамбукового лука
  EN FP: aiming a water gun
  ua FP: цілиться з водяного пістолета
107 | bowl (noun): a round deep dish for soup or cereal | loc: миска
  EN TS: The bowl is his cup now.
  ua TS: Миска тепер — його чашка.
  EN FS: The pot is his cup now.
  ua FS: Каструля тепер — його чашка.
  EN TP: drinking from a bowl
  ua TP: п'є з миски
  EN FP: washing a blue bowl
  ua FP: миє синю миску
110 | box (noun): a container with flat sides, often of cardboard | loc: коробка
  EN TS: The cat is "helping" with the boxes.
  ua TS: Кіт «допомагає» з коробками.
  EN FS: The dog is "helping" with the boxes.
  ua FS: Пес «допомагає» з коробками.
  EN TP: a big packed box
  ua TP: велика запакована коробка
  EN FP: a box of chocolates
  ua FP: коробка цукерок
111 | boxing (noun): a sport where two people fight with their fists | loc: бокс
  EN TS: Boxing makes her so happy.
  ua TS: Бокс робить її такою щасливою.
  EN FS: Tennis makes her so happy.
  ua FS: Теніс робить її такою щасливою.
  EN TP: boxing with red gloves
  ua TP: бокс у червоних рукавицях
  EN FP: boxing up old clothes
  ua FP: пакує старий одяг у коробки
112 | brave (adjective): not afraid to do something scary or hard | loc: сміливий
  EN TS: The little girl is brave, her parents not so much.
  ua TS: Маленька дівчинка смілива, а от її батьки — не дуже.
  EN FS: The little boy is brave, his parents not so much.
  ua FS: Маленький хлопчик сміливий, а от його батьки — не дуже.
  EN TP: a brave little girl
  ua TP: смілива маленька дівчинка
  EN FP: a brave knight in armour
  ua FP: сміливий лицар в обладунках
114 | bread (noun): a baked food made from flour and water | loc: хліб
  EN TS: The bread is still so warm.
  ua TS: Хліб ще такий теплий.
  EN FS: The bread is still so frozen.
  ua FS: Хліб ще такий заморожений.
  EN TP: warm bread from the oven
  ua TP: теплий хліб із печі
  EN FP: bread from the supermarket
  ua FP: хліб із супермаркету
115 | breakfast (noun): the first meal of the day | loc: сніданок
  EN TS: The rooster came for breakfast too.
  ua TS: Півень теж прийшов на сніданок.
  EN FS: The dog came for breakfast too.
  ua FS: Пес теж прийшов на сніданок.
  EN TP: breakfast in the garden
  ua TP: сніданок у саду
  EN FP: breakfast in bed
  ua FP: сніданок у ліжку
116 | breaking (noun): smashing something into pieces | loc: розбивати
  EN TS: Breaking stuff is art now!
  ua TS: Розбивати речі — тепер мистецтво!
  EN FS: Painting stuff is art now!
  ua FS: Фарбувати речі — тепер мистецтво!
  EN TP: breaking blue tiles
  ua TP: розбиває блакитну плитку
  EN FP: breaking a window
  ua FP: розбиває вікно
117 | mosaic (noun): a picture made of small tiles set side by side | loc: мозаїка
  EN TS: They made a plate mosaic.
  ua TS: Вони зробили мозаїку з тарілок.
  EN FS: They made a cup mosaic.
  ua FS: Вони зробили мозаїку з чашок.
  EN TP: a flower mosaic from plates
  ua TP: квіткова мозаїка з тарілок
  EN FP: a mosaic of glass tiles
  ua FP: мозаїка зі скляної плитки
118 | building (noun): the work of making something from parts | loc: збирати | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Building done, time for a high-five!
  ua TS: Зібрали — час дати п'ять!
  EN FS: Building done, time for a group hug!
  ua FS: Зібрали — час обійнятися всім разом!
  EN TP: building a raised planter
  ua TP: збирає високу грядку
  EN FP: a tall office building
  ua FP: висока офісна будівля
119 | bulb (noun): the glass part of a lamp that gives light | loc: лампочка
  EN TS: Bulb replaced. Task complete.
  ua TS: Лампочку замінено. Завдання виконано.
  EN FS: Fuse replaced. Task complete.
  ua FS: Запобіжник замінено. Завдання виконано.
  EN TP: screwing in a new bulb
  ua TP: вкручує нову лампочку
  EN FP: a bulb in the garden
  ua FP: цибулина в саду
120 | burger (noun): a round piece of meat served in a bread roll | loc: бургер
  EN TS: That burger needs both hands!
  ua TS: Цей бургер — лише двома руками!
  EN FS: That pizza needs both hands!
  ua FS: Ця піца — лише двома руками!
  EN TP: a tall cheese burger
  ua TP: високий бургер із сиром
  EN FP: a burger in a box
  ua FP: бургер у коробці
121 | burn (verb): to damage food or skin with too much heat | loc: спалити
  EN TS: He burned the pancake. Oops!
  ua TS: Він спалив млинець. Ой!
  EN FS: He burned the toast. Oops!
  ua FS: Він спалив тост. Ой!
  EN TP: a burned black pancake
  ua TP: спалений чорний млинець
  EN FP: a burned black steak
  ua FP: спалений чорний стейк
122 | bus stop (noun): a spot on a street to wait for public transport | loc: автобусна зупинка
  EN TS: They are waiting forever at the bus stop.
  ua TS: Вони вічність чекають на автобусній зупинці.
  EN FS: They are waiting forever at the train station.
  ua FS: Вони вічність чекають на залізничній станції.
  EN TP: waiting at a bus stop
  ua TP: чекають на автобусній зупинці
  EN FP: waiting at a taxi rank
  ua FP: чекають на стоянці таксі
123 | bush (noun): a plant like a small low tree with many branches | loc: кущ
  EN TS: A bird flew out of the bush!
  ua TS: З куща вилетів птах!
  EN FS: A cat jumped out of the bush!
  ua FS: З куща вистрибнув кіт!
  EN TP: picking from the bushes
  ua TP: збирає ягоди з кущів
  EN FP: hiding behind the bushes
  ua FP: ховається за кущами
124 | spread (verb): to push soft food over a surface in a thin layer | loc: намазувати
  EN TS: She is spreading a brick of butter.
  ua TS: Вона намазує цілу цеглину масла.
  EN FS: She is spreading a brick of cheese.
  ua FS: Вона намазує цілу цеглину сиру.
  EN TP: spreading butter on bread
  ua TP: намазує масло на хліб
  EN FP: spreading a picnic blanket
  ua FP: розстеляє ковдру для пікніка
125 | butter (noun): a soft yellow food made from cream | loc: масло
  EN TS: The butter broke the bread!
  ua TS: Масло зламало хліб!
  EN FS: The jam broke the bread!
  ua FS: Джем зламав хліб!
  EN TP: butter too hard to spread
  ua TP: надто тверде масло
  EN FP: butter in a hot pan
  ua FP: масло на гарячій сковороді
126 | button (noun): a small round thing that fastens clothes | loc: ґудзик
  EN TS: He needs help with the buttons.
  ua TS: Йому треба допомогти з ґудзиками.
  EN FS: He needs help with the shoelaces.
  ua FS: Йому треба допомогти зі шнурками.
  EN TP: a crooked row of buttons
  ua TP: кривий ряд ґудзиків
  EN FP: pressing a lift button
  ua FP: натискає кнопку ліфта
127 | cactus (noun): a desert plant covered in sharp spines | loc: кактус
  EN TS: This cactus is way too sharp!
  ua TS: Цей кактус надто колючий!
  EN FS: This palm is way too sharp!
  ua FS: Ця пальма надто колюча!
  EN TP: sharp cactus spines
  ua TP: гострі колючки кактуса
  EN FP: a cactus in a pot
  ua FP: кактус у горщику
128 | cake (noun): a sweet baked food, often for birthdays | loc: торт
  EN TS: Her birthday cake has berries.
  ua TS: На її святковому торті ягоди.
  EN FS: Her birthday cake has bananas.
  ua FS: На її святковому торті банани.
  EN TP: a cream birthday cake
  ua TP: вершковий торт на день народження
  EN FP: a chocolate wedding cake
  ua FP: шоколадний весільний торт
129 | calculator (noun): a small device that does maths for you | loc: калькулятор
  EN TS: Five plus three? He needs a calculator.
  ua TS: П'ять плюс три? Йому потрібен калькулятор.
  EN FS: Nine plus nine? He needs a calculator.
  ua FS: Дев'ять плюс дев'ять? Йому потрібен калькулятор.
  EN TP: a big desk calculator
  ua TP: великий настільний калькулятор
  EN FP: a calculator on a phone
  ua FP: калькулятор у телефоні
130 | calendar (noun): a chart showing the days, weeks and months | loc: календар
  EN TS: A heart on her calendar? Love!
  ua TS: Сердечко в її календарі? Любов!
  EN FS: A star on her calendar? Love!
  ua FS: Зірочка в її календарі? Любов!
  EN TP: a heart on the calendar
  ua TP: сердечко в календарі
  EN FP: a calendar on the desk
  ua FP: календар на столі
131 | call (verb): to phone someone and talk to them | loc: дзвонити
  EN TS: This is the best call ever.
  ua TS: Подзвонили — і це найкраща розмова в житті!
  EN FS: This is the worst call ever.
  ua FS: Подзвонили — і це найгірша розмова в житті!
  EN TP: a happy phone call
  ua TP: радісно дзвонить
  EN FP: a call for help
  ua FP: дзвонить по допомогу
132 | calories (noun): the energy units in food you burn off by moving | loc: калорії
  EN TS: Cake calories win!
  ua TS: Калорії торта перемагають!
  EN FS: Salad calories win!
  ua FS: Калорії салату перемагають!
  EN TP: burning off calories
  ua TP: спалює калорії
  EN FP: counting calories on a label
  ua FP: рахує калорії на етикетці
133 | camel (noun): a desert animal with one or two humps | loc: верблюд
  EN TS: The camel is taking a break.
  ua TS: Верблюд робить перерву.
  EN FS: The camel is taking a bath.
  ua FS: Верблюд приймає ванну.
  EN TP: a camel in the desert
  ua TP: верблюд у пустелі
  EN FP: a camel in the snow
  ua FP: верблюд у снігу
134 | camping (noun): sleeping outdoors in a tent for fun | loc: кемпінг
  EN TS: Camping in a pine forest, so cool.
  ua TS: Кемпінг у сосновому лісі — це кайф.
  EN FS: Camping on a sandy beach, so cool.
  ua FS: Кемпінг на піщаному пляжі — це кайф.
  EN TP: camping in a forest
  ua TP: кемпінг у лісі
  EN FP: camping in the garden
  ua FP: кемпінг у саду
135 | cancel (verb): to say a planned meeting or event is off | loc: скасувати
  EN TS: His plans got cancelled. Yes!
  ua TS: Його плани скасували. Є!
  EN FS: His flight got cancelled. Yes!
  ua FS: Його рейс скасували. Є!
  EN TP: cancelling plans tonight
  ua TP: скасовує плани на вечір
  EN FP: cancelling a gym membership
  ua FP: скасовує абонемент у спортзал
136 | candle (noun): a stick of wax with a string you light | loc: свічка
  EN TS: Candlelight for two? So cute.
  ua TS: Свічки на двох? Так мило.
  EN FS: Lamplight for two? So cute.
  ua FS: Лампа на двох? Так мило.
  EN TP: a candle on the table
  ua TP: свічка на столі
  EN FP: a candle on a cake
  ua FP: свічка на торті
137 | canyon (noun): a deep narrow valley with steep rock walls | loc: каньйон
  EN TS: The canyon shouts back!
  ua TS: Каньйон кричить у відповідь!
  EN FS: The forest shouts back!
  ua FS: Ліс кричить у відповідь!
  EN TP: a narrow slot canyon
  ua TP: вузький щілинний каньйон
  EN FP: a canyon from above
  ua FP: каньйон згори
138 | cap (noun): a soft hat with a stiff part at the front | loc: кепка
  EN TS: A cap, finally some shade.
  ua TS: Кепка — нарешті хоч якась тінь.
  EN FS: A tree, finally some shade.
  ua FS: Дерево — нарешті хоч якась тінь.
  EN TP: a coral cap for shade
  ua TP: коралова кепка від сонця
  EN FP: a cap on a bottle
  ua FP: кришка на пляшці
139 | capital (noun): the city where a country's government is | loc: столиця
  EN TS: He found the capital!
  ua TS: Він знайшов столицю!
  EN FS: He found the ocean!
  ua FS: Він знайшов океан!
  EN TP: the capital below the hill
  ua TP: столиця під пагорбом
  EN FP: a capital letter
  ua FP: велика літера
140 | carpet (noun): a thick soft cover for a floor | loc: килим
  EN TS: Their new carpet is so soft!
  ua TS: Їхній новий килим такий м'який!
  EN FS: Their new sofa is so soft!
  ua FS: Їхній новий диван такий м'який!
  EN TP: a soft green carpet
  ua TP: м'який зелений килим
  EN FP: a soft green blanket
  ua FP: м'яка зелена ковдра
141 | carrot (noun): a long orange vegetable that grows underground | loc: морква
  EN TS: This carrot can feed a horse.
  ua TS: Ця морква нагодує коня.
  EN FS: This potato can feed a horse.
  ua FS: Ця картоплина нагодує коня.
  EN TP: a giant carrot
  ua TP: гігантська морква
  EN FP: a giant potato
  ua FP: гігантська картоплина
142 | castle (noun): a large old stone building with strong walls | loc: замок
  EN TS: It is so big! A real castle.
  ua TS: Він такий великий! Справжній замок.
  EN FS: It is so small! A real castle.
  ua FS: Він такий маленький! Справжній замок.
  EN TP: a castle on a lake
  ua TP: замок на озері
  EN FP: a castle on a hill
  ua FP: замок на пагорбі
144 | catch (verb): to take hold of something moving through the air | loc: ловити
  EN TS: He caught the red ball.
  ua TS: Він зловив червоний м'яч.
  EN FS: He caught the blue ball.
  ua FS: Він зловив синій м'яч.
  EN TP: to catch a red ball
  ua TP: ловити червоний м'яч
  EN FP: to catch a cold
  ua FP: зловити застуду
145 | catching (noun): taking hold of something thrown to you | loc: ловіння
  EN TS: Their catching is really good.
  ua TS: Ловіння м'яча в них справді класне.
  EN FS: Their kicking is really good.
  ua FS: Удари по м'ячу в них справді класні.
  EN TP: catching an orange ball
  ua TP: ловіння помаранчевого м'яча
  EN FP: catching a cold
  ua FP: зловити застуду
146 | caterpillar (noun): the young worm-like form of a butterfly | loc: гусениця
  EN TS: This caterpillar has a five-year plan.
  ua TS: У цієї гусениці п'ятирічний план.
  EN FS: This snail has a five-year plan.
  ua FS: У цього равлика п'ятирічний план.
  EN TP: a caterpillar on a leaf
  ua TP: гусениця на листку
  EN FP: a caterpillar in a jar
  ua FP: гусениця в банці
147 | cave (noun): a large hole in rock you can go into | loc: печера
  EN TS: They are walking into a dark cave!
  ua TS: Вони заходять у темну печеру!
  EN FS: They are walking into a dark house!
  ua FS: Вони заходять у темний будинок!
  EN TP: walking into a dark cave
  ua TP: заходять у темну печеру
  EN FP: sleeping in a cave
  ua FP: сплять у печері
148 | celebrate (verb): to do something fun for a special day | loc: святкувати
  EN TS: They are celebrating!
  ua TS: Вони святкують!
  EN FS: They are studying!
  ua FS: Вони вчаться!
  EN TP: celebrating a birthday
  ua TP: святкують день народження
  EN FP: celebrating a wedding
  ua FP: святкують весілля
149 | censor (verb): to officially hide parts of a text from readers | loc: цензурувати
  EN TS: His letter got censored. Rude!
  ua TS: Його лист процензурували. Нахабство!
  EN FS: His letter got burned. Rude!
  ua FS: Його лист спалили. Нахабство!
  EN TP: a censored letter
  ua TP: процензурований лист
  EN FP: a censored film
  ua FP: процензурований фільм
150 | cereal (noun): breakfast food made from grain, eaten with milk | loc: пластівці
  EN TS: He eats cereal without milk!
  ua TS: Він їсть пластівці без молока!
  EN FS: He eats cereal without a bowl!
  ua FS: Він їсть пластівці без миски!
  EN TP: dry cereal in a bowl
  ua TP: сухі пластівці в мисці
  EN FP: cereal in a box
  ua FP: пластівці в коробці
151 | chain (noun): a row of metal rings joined together | loc: ланцюг
  EN TS: A chain secures the gate.
  ua TS: Ланцюг тримає ворота на замку.
  EN FS: A rope secures the gate.
  ua FS: Мотузка тримає ворота на замку.
  EN TP: a chain around a gate
  ua TP: ланцюг на воротах
  EN FP: a chain around a bike
  ua FP: ланцюг на велосипеді
152 | chair (noun): a seat for one person, with a back | loc: стілець
  EN TS: Best chair ever! Full circle!
  ua TS: Найкращий стілець у світі! Оберт на 360!
  EN FS: Best sofa ever! Full circle!
  ua FS: Найкращий диван у світі! Оберт на 360!
  EN TP: a new swivel chair
  ua TP: новий обертовий стілець
  EN FP: a new rocking chair
  ua FP: нове крісло-гойдалка
153 | champagne (noun): a sparkling white wine opened at celebrations | loc: шампанське
  EN TS: The champagne cork is flying!
  ua TS: Корок від шампанського летить!
  EN FS: The champagne glass is flying!
  ua FS: Келих шампанського летить!
  EN TP: pouring champagne
  ua TP: наливає шампанське
  EN FP: spraying champagne on a podium
  ua FP: бризкає шампанським на подіумі
154 | charger (noun): a device that puts power back into a battery | loc: зарядка
  EN TS: The charger was in the drawer!
  ua TS: Зарядка була в шухляді!
  EN FS: The charger was in the fridge!
  ua FS: Зарядка була в холодильнику!
  EN TP: plugging in a charger
  ua TP: вмикає зарядку
  EN FP: a charger for a car
  ua FP: зарядка для машини
155 | cheese (noun): a food made from milk, often yellow | loc: сир
  EN TS: The cheese stretches forever!
  ua TS: Сир тягнеться безкінечно!
  EN FS: The bread stretches forever!
  ua FS: Хліб тягнеться безкінечно!
  EN TP: stretchy melted cheese
  ua TP: тягучий розплавлений сир
  EN FP: cheese on a pizza
  ua FP: сир на піці
156 | chest (noun): the front upper part of the body | loc: груди
  EN TS: His medal is on his chest.
  ua TS: Його медаль у нього на грудях.
  EN FS: His medal is on his head.
  ua FS: Його медаль у нього на голові.
  EN TP: hands on his chest
  ua TP: руки на грудях
  EN FP: hands on his head
  ua FP: руки на голові
157 | chewing gum (noun): a soft sweet you keep biting but never swallow | loc: жуйка
  EN TS: Her chewing gum is so pink.
  ua TS: Її жуйка така рожева.
  EN FS: Her chewing gum is so green.
  ua FS: Її жуйка така зелена.
  EN TP: blowing chewing gum bubbles
  ua TP: надуває бульбашки з жуйки
  EN FP: chewing gum under a desk
  ua FP: жуйка під партою
158 | chewing (noun): biting food again and again in your mouth | loc: жування
  EN TS: The chewing is hard work!
  ua TS: Жування — це важка праця!
  EN FS: The walking is hard work!
  ua FS: Ходьба — це важка праця!
  EN TP: chewing sticky toffee
  ua TP: жування липкої ірки
  EN FP: chewing a pencil
  ua FP: жування олівця
159 | chicken (noun): a farm bird kept for its eggs and meat | loc: курка
  EN TS: The chicken laid an egg!
  ua TS: Курка знесла яйце!
  EN FS: The chicken ate an egg!
  ua FS: Курка з'їла яйце!
  EN TP: a chicken in a coop
  ua TP: курка в курнику
  EN FP: a chicken on a plate
  ua FP: курка на тарілці
160 | nest (noun): the straw bed a bird makes to sit on its eggs | loc: гніздо
  EN TS: Fact: the hen is in her nest.
  ua TS: Факт: курка сидить у своєму гнізді.
  EN FS: Fact: the duck is in her nest.
  ua FS: Факт: качка сидить у своєму гнізді.
  EN TP: a hen in her nest
  ua TP: курка в гнізді
  EN FP: a hen building a nest
  ua FP: курка в'є гніздо
161 | chicken drumstick (noun): the lower leg of a cooked chicken that you eat | loc: куряча гомілка
  EN TS: The dog wants that chicken drumstick.
  ua TS: Пес хоче ту курячу гомілку.
  EN FS: The cat wants that chicken drumstick.
  ua FS: Кіт хоче ту курячу гомілку.
  EN TP: biting a chicken drumstick
  ua TP: кусає курячу гомілку
  EN FP: a drumstick for a drum
  ua FP: паличка для барабана
162 | chocolate (noun): a sweet brown food made from cocoa | loc: шоколад
  EN TS: He is melting chocolate.
  ua TS: Він розтоплює шоколад.
  EN FS: He is melting butter.
  ua FS: Він розтоплює масло.
  EN TP: melting chocolate in a pot
  ua TP: розтоплює шоколад у каструлі
  EN FP: a chocolate birthday cake
  ua FP: шоколадний торт на день народження
163 | chopsticks (noun): a pair of thin wooden rods for picking up food | loc: палички
  EN TS: He can use chopsticks now!
  ua TS: Він уже вміє їсти паличками!
  EN FS: He can use a fork now!
  ua FS: Він уже вміє їсти виделкою!
  EN TP: holding chopsticks
  ua TP: тримає палички
  EN FP: breaking chopsticks
  ua FP: ламає палички
164 | dumpling (noun): a small steamed ball of dough with a filling | loc: дамплінг
  EN TS: Whole dumpling, one bite!
  ua TS: Цілий дамплінг за один укус!
  EN FS: Whole pizza, one bite!
  ua FS: Ціла піца за один укус!
  EN TP: a whole soup dumpling
  ua TP: цілий дамплінг із супом
  EN FP: making dumplings at home
  ua FP: ліпить дамплінги вдома
165 | cinema (noun): a place where you watch films on a big screen | loc: кінотеатр
  EN TS: They are at the cinema.
  ua TS: Вони в кінотеатрі.
  EN FS: They are at the zoo.
  ua FS: Вони в зоопарку.
  EN TP: a dark cinema
  ua TP: темний кінотеатр
  EN FP: a cinema ticket
  ua FP: квиток у кінотеатр
166 | circle (noun): a perfectly round shape | loc: коло
  EN TS: They form a perfect circle.
  ua TS: Вони утворюють ідеальне коло.
  EN FS: They form a perfect line.
  ua FS: Вони утворюють ідеальну лінію.
  EN TP: a human circle
  ua TP: коло з людей
  EN FP: a circle of chairs
  ua FP: коло зі стільців
167 | citizen (noun): someone who legally belongs to a country | loc: громадянин
  EN TS: A good citizen votes and cleans.
  ua TS: Хороший громадянин голосує і прибирає.
  EN FS: A good citizen votes and dances.
  ua FS: Хороший громадянин голосує і танцює.
  EN TP: a proud citizen voting
  ua TP: гордий громадянин голосує
  EN FP: a citizen paying taxes
  ua FP: громадянин сплачує податки
168 | citizenship (noun): the legal status of belonging to a country | loc: громадянство
  EN TS: They got their citizenship!
  ua TS: Вони отримали громадянство!
  EN FS: They got their medals!
  ua FS: Вони отримали медалі!
  EN TP: receiving citizenship papers
  ua TP: отримують документи про громадянство
  EN FP: losing citizenship
  ua FP: втрачають громадянство
169 | clay (noun): soft wet earth shaped and baked into pots | loc: глина
  EN TS: The clay became a bowl.
  ua TS: Глина стала мискою.
  EN FS: The clay became a vase.
  ua FS: Глина стала вазою.
  EN TP: a wet lump of clay
  ua TP: вологий шматок глини
  EN FP: a clay tennis court
  ua FP: ґрунтовий тенісний корт
170 | cleaner (noun): a person whose job is to tidy and wash rooms | loc: прибиральниця
  EN TS: The cleaner fixed this mess!
  ua TS: Прибиральниця розгребла цей безлад!
  EN FS: The cook fixed this mess!
  ua FS: Кухарка розгребла цей безлад!
  EN TP: a hotel cleaner
  ua TP: прибиральниця в готелі
  EN FP: a window cleaner
  ua FP: мийник вікон
171 | correct (adjective): right, with no mistakes | loc: правильний
  EN TS: The boy is correct, the girl is not.
  ua TS: У хлопця правильна відповідь, у дівчини — ні.
  EN FS: The girl is correct, the boy is not.
  ua FS: У дівчини правильна відповідь, у хлопця — ні.
  EN TP: a correct answer
  ua TP: правильна відповідь
  EN FP: a correct spelling
  ua FP: правильне написання
172 | cleats (noun): sports shoes with studs for grip on grass | loc: бутси
  EN TS: His cleats grip the wet grass.
  ua TS: Його бутси тримаються на мокрій траві.
  EN FS: His cleats grip the wet sand.
  ua FS: Його бутси тримаються на мокрому піску.
  EN TP: lacing up the cleats
  ua TP: зашнуровує бутси
  EN FP: lacing up the skates
  ua FP: зашнуровує ковзани
173 | cliff (noun): a high steep wall of rock | loc: скеля
  EN TS: They are lying on a cliff.
  ua TS: Вони лежать на скелі.
  EN FS: They are lying on a beach.
  ua FS: Вони лежать на пляжі.
  EN TP: the edge of a cliff
  ua TP: край скелі
  EN FP: climbing a cliff
  ua FP: лазить по скелі
174 | clinic (noun): a small medical center you visit without staying | loc: клініка
  EN TS: They are at a clinic desk.
  ua TS: Вони біля стійки реєстрації в клініці.
  EN FS: They are at a hotel desk.
  ua FS: Вони біля стійки реєстрації в готелі.
  EN TP: a visit to the clinic
  ua TP: візит до клініки
  EN FP: a visit to the gym
  ua FP: візит до спортзалу
175 | clock (noun): a device on a wall or table showing the time | loc: годинник
  EN TS: They are hanging a clock.
  ua TS: Вони вішають годинник.
  EN FS: They are hanging a picture.
  ua FS: Вони вішають картину.
  EN TP: a round kitchen clock
  ua TP: круглий кухонний годинник
  EN FP: a round kitchen table
  ua FP: круглий кухонний стіл
176 | coal (noun): the black rock that you burn for heat | loc: вугілля
  EN TS: Coal in, fire up!
  ua TS: Вугілля всипали — вогонь пішов!
  EN FS: Wood in, fire up!
  ua FS: Дрова всипали — вогонь пішов!
  EN TP: loading coal into the stove
  ua TP: засипає вугілля в піч
  EN FP: a deep coal mine
  ua FP: глибока вугільна шахта
177 | coat (noun): a warm jacket you wear over your clothes outside | loc: пальто
  EN TS: Coat on. Winter, do your worst.
  ua TS: Пальто на мені. Ну що, зимо, спробуй!
  EN FS: Gloves on. Winter, do your worst.
  ua FS: Рукавиці на мені. Ну що, зимо, спробуй!
  EN TP: buttoning a long coat
  ua TP: застібає довге пальто
  EN FP: hanging up a long coat
  ua FP: вішає довге пальто
178 | cocktail (noun): a mixed drink shaken with fruit and ice | loc: коктейль
  EN TS: The cocktail has an umbrella.
  ua TS: У коктейлі парасолька.
  EN FS: The cocktail has a flag.
  ua FS: У коктейлі прапорець.
  EN TP: a layered orange cocktail
  ua TP: шаруватий помаранчевий коктейль
  EN FP: a cocktail party dress
  ua FP: коктейльна сукня
179 | coffee (noun): a hot dark drink made from roasted beans | loc: кава
  EN TS: Coffee works like magic!
  ua TS: Кава діє як магія!
  EN FS: Water works like magic!
  ua FS: Вода діє як магія!
  EN TP: coffee from a moka pot
  ua TP: кава з гейзерної кавоварки
  EN FP: coffee from a machine
  ua FP: кава з автомата
180 | cold (adjective): having a low temperature, not warm | loc: холодний
  EN TS: So cold! Her hand says no.
  ua TS: Надто холодна! Її рука каже «ні».
  EN FS: So hot! Her hand says no.
  ua FS: Надто гаряча! Її рука каже «ні».
  EN TP: a cold frozen lake
  ua TP: холодне замерзле озеро
  EN FP: a cold drink
  ua FP: холодний напій
181 | collar (noun): the part of a shirt that goes around your neck | loc: комір
  EN TS: Collar up? No way!
  ua TS: Комір догори? Та ні!
  EN FS: Sleeves up? No way!
  ua FS: Рукави догори? Та ні!
  EN TP: a collar popped up
  ua TP: піднятий комір
  EN FP: a dog's collar
  ua FP: собачий нашийник
182 | comb (noun): a flat tool with thin teeth to tidy your hair | loc: гребінець
  EN TS: He has an orange comb.
  ua TS: У нього помаранчевий гребінець.
  EN FS: He has a blue comb.
  ua FS: У нього синій гребінець.
  EN TP: an orange plastic comb
  ua TP: помаранчевий пластиковий гребінець
  EN FP: a comb for a dog
  ua FP: гребінець для собаки
183 | comfort (verb): to make a sad person feel better | loc: втішати
  EN TS: Her friend is comforting her.
  ua TS: Подруга її втішає.
  EN FS: Her friend is ignoring her.
  ua FS: Подруга її ігнорує.
  EN TP: comforting a crying friend
  ua TP: втішає заплакану подругу
  EN FP: comforting a crying baby
  ua FP: втішає заплакану дитину
184 | command (verb): to give someone an order they must obey | loc: наказувати
  EN TS: She commands, they run.
  ua TS: Вона наказує — вони біжать.
  EN FS: She commands, they sleep.
  ua FS: Вона наказує — вони сплять.
  EN TP: commanding a line of trainees
  ua TP: наказує шерензі новобранців
  EN FP: commanding a ship
  ua FP: наказує екіпажу корабля
185 | commute (verb): to travel regularly between home and work | loc: їздити на роботу
  EN TS: He commutes by tram. Yawn.
  ua TS: Він їздить на роботу трамваєм. Нудьга.
  EN FS: He commutes by boat. Yawn.
  ua FS: Він їздить на роботу човном. Нудьга.
  EN TP: commuting by tram
  ua TP: їздить на роботу трамваєм
  EN FP: commuting by bike
  ua FP: їздить на роботу велосипедом
186 | concert (noun): a show where musicians play live music | loc: концерт
  EN TS: Even the dog is at the concert!
  ua TS: Навіть пес на концерті!
  EN FS: Even the cat is at the concert!
  ua FS: Навіть кіт на концерті!
  EN TP: an open-air concert
  ua TP: концерт просто неба
  EN FP: a concert hall
  ua FP: концертна зала
187 | confused (adjective): not able to understand what is going on | loc: розгублений
  EN TS: The instructions confused her.
  ua TS: Вона розгублена через інструкцію.
  EN FS: The map confused her.
  ua FS: Вона розгублена через мапу.
  EN TP: confused by the instructions
  ua TP: розгублена через інструкцію
  EN FP: confused about the date
  ua FP: розгублена через дату
188 | constitution (noun): the basic written law of a country | loc: конституція
  EN TS: The constitution says no.
  ua TS: Конституція каже «ні».
  EN FS: The constitution says yes.
  ua FS: Конституція каже «так».
  EN TP: reading the constitution
  ua TP: читає конституцію
  EN FP: writing a new constitution
  ua FP: пише нову конституцію
189 | convoy (noun): a group of vehicles traveling together | loc: конвой
  EN TS: Three cars form a convoy.
  ua TS: Три машини утворюють конвой.
  EN FS: Five cars form a convoy.
  ua FS: П'ять машин утворюють конвой.
  EN TP: a convoy of sports cars
  ua TP: конвой спорткарів
  EN FP: a convoy of trucks
  ua FP: конвой вантажівок
190 | cookie (noun): a small flat sweet baked snack | loc: печиво
  EN TS: She is dunking her cookie.
  ua TS: Вона вмочує печиво.
  EN FS: She is dunking her bread.
  ua FS: Вона вмочує хліб.
  EN TP: dunking a cookie
  ua TP: вмочує печиво
  EN FP: baking a cookie cake
  ua FP: пече торт із печива
191 | corkscrew (noun): a tool with a metal spiral for pulling corks | loc: штопор
  EN TS: He is using a corkscrew.
  ua TS: Він користується штопором.
  EN FS: He is using a knife.
  ua FS: Він користується ножем.
  EN TP: twisting in a corkscrew
  ua TP: вкручує штопор
  EN FP: a corkscrew in a drawer
  ua FP: штопор у шухляді
192 | corner (noun): the place where two streets meet | loc: кут
  EN TS: They are hiding round the corner!
  ua TS: Вони ховаються за кутом!
  EN FS: They are hiding under the table!
  ua FS: Вони ховаються під столом!
  EN TP: around the corner
  ua TP: за кутом
  EN FP: a corner shop
  ua FP: магазинчик на розі
193 | corrupt (adjective): using power dishonestly to get money | loc: корумпований
  EN TS: What a corrupt official!
  ua TS: Який корумпований чиновник!
  EN FS: What an honest official!
  ua FS: Який чесний чиновник!
  EN TP: a corrupt official
  ua TP: корумпований чиновник
  EN FP: a corrupt computer file
  ua FP: пошкоджений файл
194 | cotton (noun): a soft white plant fiber used to make cloth | loc: бавовна
  EN TS: The cotton is so soft.
  ua TS: Бавовна така м'яка.
  EN FS: The wool is so soft.
  ua FS: Вовна така м'яка.
  EN TP: picking soft cotton
  ua TP: збирає м'яку бавовну
  EN FP: buying cotton sheets
  ua FP: купує бавовняні простирадла
195 | coughing (noun): loud bursts of air from your throat when ill | loc: кашель
  EN TS: Honey tea stops the coughing.
  ua TS: Чай з медом зупиняє кашель.
  EN FS: Cold beer stops the coughing.
  ua FS: Холодне пиво зупиняє кашель.
  EN TP: coughing in an armchair
  ua TP: кашель у кріслі
  EN FP: coughing at a concert
  ua FP: кашель на концерті
196 | courage (noun): being able to act even when you are afraid | loc: сміливість
  EN TS: Courage got her across!
  ua TS: Сміливість допомогла їй перейти!
  EN FS: A zip line got her across!
  ua FS: Тролей допоміг їй перейти!
  EN TP: crossing with courage
  ua TP: переходить зі сміливістю
  EN FP: the courage to jump down
  ua FP: сміливість стрибнути вниз
197 | cow (noun): a large farm animal that gives milk | loc: корова
  EN TS: The cow is being milked.
  ua TS: Корову доять.
  EN FS: The goat is being milked.
  ua FS: Козу доять.
  EN TP: a cow with a bell
  ua TP: корова з дзвіночком
  EN FP: a cow with a hat
  ua FP: корова в капелюсі
198 | cramp (noun): a sudden painful tightening of a muscle | loc: судома
  EN TS: A cramp stopped her run.
  ua TS: Судома зупинила її пробіжку.
  EN FS: A cramp stopped her swim.
  ua FS: Судома зупинила її заплив.
  EN TP: a cramp in the calf
  ua TP: судома в литці
  EN FP: a cramp in the hand
  ua FP: судома в руці
199 | crash (verb): to hit something hard with a loud noise | loc: розбиватися | checker: word_missing? | translator note: loc розбиватися = get wrecked; bumper-car sense needs врізатися
  EN TS: He is crashing into everyone!
  ua TS: Він урізається в усіх!
  EN FS: He is crashing into a wall!
  ua FS: Він урізається в стіну!
  EN TP: crashing bumper cars
  ua TP: машинки на автодромі врізаються
  EN FP: crashing a real car
  ua FP: розбиває справжню машину
200 | cream (noun): the thick fatty part of milk | loc: вершки
  EN TS: He is holding cream over his head!
  ua TS: Він тримає вершки над головою!
  EN FS: He is holding soup over his head!
  ua FS: Він тримає суп над головою!
  EN TP: stiff whipped cream
  ua TP: густі збиті вершки
  EN FP: a cream for the face
  ua FP: крем для обличчя
201 | crocodile (noun): a big reptile with a long body and sharp teeth | loc: крокодил
  EN TS: Nice teeth, crocodile!
  ua TS: Класні зуби, крокодиле!
  EN FS: Nice teeth, lion!
  ua FS: Класні зуби, леве!
  EN TP: a crocodile with open jaws
  ua TP: крокодил із роззявленою пащею
  EN FP: a crocodile with closed eyes
  ua FP: крокодил із заплющеними очима
202 | cross (verb): to go from one side of a road to the other | loc: переходити
  EN TS: Phone down. Now he can cross.
  ua TS: Телефон геть. Тепер він може переходити.
  EN FS: Phone down. Now he can swim.
  ua FS: Телефон геть. Тепер він може плавати.
  EN TP: to cross the street safely
  ua TP: безпечно переходити вулицю
  EN FP: to cross your fingers
  ua FP: схрестити пальці
203 | cruise (noun): a holiday trip on a large ship | loc: круїз
  EN TS: Their cruise has dolphins too!
  ua TS: У їхньому круїзі ще й дельфіни!
  EN FS: Their cruise has sharks too!
  ua FS: У їхньому круїзі ще й акули!
  EN TP: a cruise to tropical islands
  ua TP: круїз до тропічних островів
  EN FP: a cruise to Antarctica
  ua FP: круїз до Антарктиди
204 | crutch (noun): a stick under the arm that helps you walk | loc: милиця
  EN TS: He is racing on his crutches!
  ua TS: Він мчить на милицях!
  EN FS: He is racing on his bike!
  ua FS: Він мчить на велосипеді!
  EN TP: walking on two crutches
  ua TP: іде на двох милицях
  EN FP: leaning on one crutch
  ua FP: спирається на одну милицю
205 | crying (noun): letting tears fall because you feel sad | loc: плач
  EN TS: Sad film. Both are crying.
  ua TS: Сумний фільм — і плач на двох.
  EN FS: Sad film. Both are sleeping.
  ua FS: Сумний фільм — і сон на двох.
  EN TP: crying at a sad film
  ua TP: плач над сумним фільмом
  EN FP: crying at a wedding
  ua FP: плач на весіллі
206 | cucumber (noun): a long green vegetable often eaten in salads | loc: огірок
  EN TS: Her cucumber spa is cheap.
  ua TS: Її спа з огірків — бюджетний.
  EN FS: Her lemon spa is cheap.
  ua FS: Її спа з лимонів — бюджетний.
  EN TP: cucumber slices on the eyes
  ua TP: скибочки огірка на очах
  EN FP: cucumber in a sandwich
  ua FP: огірок у сендвічі
207 | cup (noun): a small container with a handle for hot drinks | loc: чашка
  EN TS: Her cup is small and green.
  ua TS: Її чашка маленька й зелена.
  EN FS: Her cup is small and blue.
  ua FS: Її чашка маленька й синя.
  EN TP: a small green cup
  ua TP: маленька зелена чашка
  EN FP: a cup of coffee
  ua FP: чашка кави
209 | curious (adjective): wanting to know what is going on | loc: допитливий
  EN TS: Curious cat, no privacy.
  ua TS: Допитливий кіт, ніякої приватності.
  EN FS: Curious dog, no privacy.
  ua FS: Допитливий пес, ніякої приватності.
  EN TP: a curious cat peeking in
  ua TP: допитливий кіт зазирає
  EN FP: a curious dog peeking in
  ua FP: допитливий пес зазирає
210 | customer (noun): a person who buys things in a shop | loc: покупець | translator note: feminine покупниця (she)
  EN TS: She is a happy customer.
  ua TS: Вона щаслива покупниця.
  EN FS: She is a sad customer.
  ua FS: Вона сумна покупниця.
  EN TP: a customer at the counter
  ua TP: покупниця біля каси
  EN FP: a customer at the door
  ua FP: покупниця біля дверей
211 | customs (noun): the border check on what you bring into a country | loc: митниця
  EN TS: "Just one fruit!" Customs said no.
  ua TS: «Лише один фрукт!» Митниця сказала «ні».
  EN FS: "Just one shoe!" Customs said no.
  ua FS: «Лише один черевик!» Митниця сказала «ні».
  EN TP: a fruit at customs
  ua TP: фрукт на митниці
  EN FP: a fruit at the market
  ua FP: фрукт на ринку
212 | dancer (noun): a person who moves to music as art or as a job | loc: танцівник
  EN TS: This dancer has great moves.
  ua TS: У цього танцівника класні рухи.
  EN FS: This singer has great moves.
  ua FS: У цього співака класні рухи.
  EN TP: a hip-hop dancer
  ua TP: хіп-хоп танцівник
  EN FP: a ballet dancer on stage
  ua FP: балетний танцівник на сцені
213 | dancing (noun): moving your body to the beat of music | loc: танці
  EN TS: His dancing is really smooth.
  ua TS: Його танці такі плавні.
  EN FS: His singing is really smooth.
  ua FS: Його спів такий плавний.
  EN TP: salsa dancing in the kitchen
  ua TP: танці сальси на кухні
  EN FP: dancing in the rain
  ua FP: танці під дощем
214 | dangerous (adjective): likely to hurt you or cause harm | loc: небезпечний
  EN TS: This ice is dangerous!
  ua TS: Цей лід небезпечний!
  EN FS: This ice is safe!
  ua FS: Цей лід безпечний!
  EN TP: dangerous thin ice
  ua TP: небезпечний тонкий лід
  EN FP: dangerous ice on a road
  ua FP: небезпечна ожеледь на дорозі
215 | darkness (noun): the state when there is no light | loc: темрява
  EN TS: The room fell into darkness.
  ua TS: Кімната поринула в темряву.
  EN FS: The garden fell into darkness.
  ua FS: Сад поринув у темряву.
  EN TP: a kitchen in darkness
  ua TP: кухня в темряві
  EN FP: darkness in a cinema
  ua FP: темрява в кінотеатрі
217 | dart (noun): a small pointed arrow you throw at a round board | loc: дротик
  EN TS: Her dart is near the bullseye!
  ua TS: Її дротик біля самого яблучка!
  EN FS: Her dart is near the door!
  ua FS: Її дротик біля самих дверей!
  EN TP: throwing a turquoise dart
  ua TP: кидає бірюзовий дротик
  EN FP: throwing a turquoise ball
  ua FP: кидає бірюзовий м'яч
218 | declare (verb): to announce something officially in public | loc: проголошувати
  EN TS: She declared the bridge open.
  ua TS: Вона проголосила міст відкритим.
  EN FS: She declared the school open.
  ua FS: Вона проголосила школу відкритою.
  EN TP: declaring the bridge open
  ua TP: проголошує міст відкритим
  EN FP: declaring goods at customs
  ua FP: декларує товари на митниці
219 | deer (noun): a wild forest animal, the males have antlers | loc: олень
  EN TS: The deer is shouting at us!
  ua TS: Олень на нас кричить!
  EN FS: The deer is running at us!
  ua FS: Олень на нас біжить!
  EN TP: a deer in the fog
  ua TP: олень у тумані
  EN FP: a deer in the snow
  ua FP: олень у снігу
220 | defrost (verb): to let frozen food become soft again | loc: розморожувати
  EN TS: He defrosted the fish.
  ua TS: Він розморозив рибу.
  EN FS: He defrosted the chicken.
  ua FS: Він розморозив курку.
  EN TP: a defrosted fish fillet
  ua TP: розморожене рибне філе
  EN FP: defrosting the car window
  ua FP: розморожує вікно машини
221 | degree (noun): the qualification you get for finishing university | loc: диплом про вищу освіту
  EN TS: She is holding up her degree.
  ua TS: Вона тримає свій диплом про вищу освіту.
  EN FS: She is holding up her baby.
  ua FS: Вона тримає свою дитину.
  EN TP: holding up her degree
  ua TP: тримає диплом про вищу освіту
  EN FP: studying for her degree
  ua FP: вчиться заради диплома
222 | delay (noun): when something happens later than planned | loc: затримка
  EN TS: This delay is taking forever.
  ua TS: Ця затримка тягнеться вічність.
  EN FS: This train is taking forever.
  ua FS: Цей поїзд тягнеться вічність.
  EN TP: a delay at the station
  ua TP: затримка на вокзалі
  EN FP: a delay at the airport
  ua FP: затримка в аеропорту
223 | delivery (noun): bringing food or goods to someone's door | loc: доставка
  EN TS: The delivery is finally here!
  ua TS: Доставка нарешті тут!
  EN FS: The plumber is finally here!
  ua FS: Сантехнік нарешті тут!
  EN TP: a food delivery
  ua TP: доставка їжі
  EN FP: a parcel delivery
  ua FP: доставка посилки
224 | designing (noun): planning how something will look before making it | loc: проєктувати
  EN TS: Designing a chair is fun.
  ua TS: Проєктувати стілець — це весело.
  EN FS: Designing a table is fun.
  ua FS: Проєктувати стіл — це весело.
  EN TP: designing a model chair
  ua TP: проєктує модель стільця
  EN FP: designing a dress
  ua FP: створює дизайн сукні
225 | desk (noun): a table you sit at to work or study | loc: письмовий стіл
  EN TS: Her desk is ready. The cat agrees.
  ua TS: Її письмовий стіл готовий. Кіт згоден.
  EN FS: Her desk is ready. The dog agrees.
  ua FS: Її письмовий стіл готовий. Пес згоден.
  EN TP: a clean desk for work
  ua TP: чистий письмовий стіл для роботи
  EN FP: a clean desk for dinner
  ua FP: чистий стіл для вечері
226 | despair (noun): the feeling of losing all hope | loc: відчай | translator note: case read as a busker's instrument case (футляр)
  EN TS: Empty case, total despair.
  ua TS: Порожній футляр, повний відчай.
  EN FS: Full case, total despair.
  ua FS: Повний футляр, повний відчай.
  EN TP: despair in an empty tunnel
  ua TP: відчай у порожньому тунелі
  EN FP: despair after an exam
  ua FP: відчай після іспиту
227 | diamond (noun): a very hard, sparkling stone used in jewelry | loc: діамант
  EN TS: That diamond is on fire!
  ua TS: Цей діамант аж палає!
  EN FS: That ruby is on fire!
  ua FS: Цей рубін аж палає!
  EN TP: a sparkling diamond ring
  ua TP: блискучий перстень із діамантом
  EN FP: a diamond necklace
  ua FP: діамантове намисто
228 | dinner (noun): the main meal of the evening | loc: вечеря
  EN TS: Dinner by the sea is not bad.
  ua TS: Вечеря біля моря — непогано.
  EN FS: Dinner by the pool is not bad.
  ua FS: Вечеря біля басейну — непогано.
  EN TP: dinner on the terrace
  ua TP: вечеря на терасі
  EN FP: dinner in the kitchen
  ua FP: вечеря на кухні
229 | diploma (noun): the official paper you get for finishing a course | loc: диплом
  EN TS: He got his diploma at last!
  ua TS: Він нарешті отримав диплом!
  EN FS: He got his medal at last!
  ua FS: Він нарешті отримав медаль!
  EN TP: receiving a diploma
  ua TP: отримує диплом
  EN FP: framing a diploma
  ua FP: вставляє диплом у рамку
230 | director (noun): the person who runs a film and directs the actors | loc: режисер
  EN TS: The director wants it slower.
  ua TS: Режисер хоче повільніше.
  EN FS: The director wants it faster.
  ua FS: Режисер хоче швидше.
  EN TP: a director shouting cut
  ua TP: режисер кричить «Стоп!»
  EN FP: a director of a bank
  ua FP: директор банку
231 | disappoint (verb): to make someone sad by not doing what they hoped | loc: розчаровувати
  EN TS: He disappointed her badly.
  ua TS: Він її сильно розчарував.
  EN FS: He disappointed his boss.
  ua FS: Він сильно розчарував свого боса.
  EN TP: disappointing his partner
  ua TP: розчаровує свою партнерку
  EN FP: disappointing test results
  ua FP: розчарувальні результати тесту
232 | disappointed (adjective): sad because something was not as good as you hoped | loc: розчарований
  EN TS: He is a little disappointed.
  ua TS: Він трохи розчарований.
  EN FS: She is a little disappointed.
  ua FS: Вона трохи розчарована.
  EN TP: a disappointed customer
  ua TP: розчарований покупець
  EN FP: disappointed by the rain
  ua FP: розчарований через дощ
233 | dislocate (verb): to push a bone out of its normal place in a joint | loc: вивихнути
  EN TS: He dislocated his shoulder.
  ua TS: Він вивихнув плече.
  EN FS: He dislocated his knee.
  ua FS: Він вивихнув коліно.
  EN TP: a dislocated shoulder
  ua TP: вивихнуте плече
  EN FP: a dislocated finger
  ua FP: вивихнутий палець
234 | dissolve (verb): to mix into a liquid and disappear | loc: розчинятися
  EN TS: The sugar dissolved. Magic!
  ua TS: Цукор розчинився. Магія!
  EN FS: The salt dissolved. Magic!
  ua FS: Сіль розчинилася. Магія!
  EN TP: a sugar cube dissolving
  ua TP: кубик цукру розчиняється
  EN FP: a pill dissolving
  ua FP: таблетка розчиняється
235 | fetch (verb): to run after something and bring it back | loc: приносити | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Dude, he fetched the ball.
  ua TS: Чувак, він приніс м'яч.
  EN FS: Dude, he fetched a stick.
  ua FS: Чувак, він приніс палицю.
  EN TP: fetching a red ball
  ua TP: приносить червоний м'яч
  EN FP: fetching a red apple
  ua FP: приносить червоне яблуко
236 | dolphin (noun): a smart sea animal that jumps and plays | loc: дельфін
  EN TS: The dolphin is racing a boat.
  ua TS: Дельфін змагається з човном.
  EN FS: The dolphin is racing a shark.
  ua FS: Дельфін змагається з акулою.
  EN TP: a dolphin beside a boat
  ua TP: дельфін біля човна
  EN FP: a dolphin in a pool
  ua FP: дельфін у басейні
237 | donkey (noun): a small grey animal with long ears | loc: віслюк
  EN TS: The donkey is rolling in the dust like it's a spa.
  ua TS: Віслюк качається в пилюці, ніби це спа.
  EN FS: The donkey is rolling in the mud like it's a spa.
  ua FS: Віслюк качається в багнюці, ніби це спа.
  EN TP: a donkey rolling in dust
  ua TP: віслюк качається в пилюці
  EN FP: a donkey carrying a bag
  ua FP: віслюк несе торбу
238 | steal (verb): to take something that is not yours | loc: красти | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He stole a drink!
  ua TS: Він украв напій!
  EN FS: He stole a shoe!
  ua FS: Він украв черевик!
  EN TP: stealing a customer's drink
  ua TP: краде напій клієнта
  EN FP: stealing a customer's parcel
  ua FP: краде посилку клієнта
239 | doubt (verb): to not be sure that something is true | loc: сумніватися
  EN TS: He doubts the ring is gold.
  ua TS: Він сумнівається, що каблучка золота.
  EN FS: He is sure the ring is gold.
  ua FS: Він певен, що каблучка золота.
  EN TP: doubting a gold ring
  ua TP: сумнівається в золотій каблучці
  EN FP: doubting his girlfriend
  ua FP: сумнівається у своїй дівчині
240 | draw (noun): a result where neither side wins | loc: нічия
  EN TS: Grandma calls it a draw.
  ua TS: Бабуся оголошує нічию.
  EN FS: The dog calls it a draw.
  ua FS: Пес оголошує нічию.
  EN TP: an arm-wrestling draw
  ua TP: нічия в армрестлінгу
  EN FP: a draw in football
  ua FP: нічия у футболі
241 | drawing (noun): making pictures with a pencil or pen | loc: малюнок
  EN TS: The drawing looks just like the real harbour!
  ua TS: Малюнок точнісінько як справжня гавань!
  EN FS: The drawing looks just like the real mountain!
  ua FS: Малюнок точнісінько як справжня гора!
  EN TP: a pencil drawing of houses
  ua TP: малюнок будинків олівцем
  EN FP: a drawing on a wall
  ua FP: малюнок на стіні
242 | dress (noun): a one-piece item of clothing with a skirt | loc: сукня
  EN TS: Spin again! Great dress!
  ua TS: Покрутися ще! Класна сукня!
  EN FS: Spin again! Great hat!
  ua FS: Покрутися ще! Класний капелюх!
  EN TP: a red summer dress
  ua TP: червона літня сукня
  EN FP: a red wedding dress
  ua FP: червона весільна сукня
243 | dressing (noun): putting on your clothes | loc: одягання
  EN TS: Winter dressing is hard work!
  ua TS: Зимове одягання — це важка праця!
  EN FS: Summer dressing is hard work!
  ua FS: Літнє одягання — це важка праця!
  EN TP: fast dressing for winter
  ua TP: швидке одягання взимку
  EN FP: dressing a salad
  ua FP: заправляє салат
244 | drink (noun): a liquid you swallow, like juice or water | loc: напій
  EN TS: One drink was not enough.
  ua TS: Одного напою було замало.
  EN FS: One sandwich was not enough.
  ua FS: Одного сендвіча було замало.
  EN TP: a fresh orange drink
  ua TP: свіжий апельсиновий напій
  EN FP: a hot drink
  ua FP: гарячий напій
245 | drinking (noun): taking liquid into your mouth and swallowing | loc: пиття
  EN TS: She is drinking like a camel!
  ua TS: Її пиття — рівень верблюд!
  EN FS: She is eating like a camel!
  ua FS: Її їда — рівень верблюд!
  EN TP: drinking from a steel bottle
  ua TP: пиття зі сталевої пляшки
  EN FP: drinking at a party
  ua FP: пиття на вечірці
246 | driving (noun): controlling a car as it moves along | loc: водіння
  EN TS: That driving is so smooth.
  ua TS: Таке плавне водіння.
  EN FS: That cycling is so smooth.
  ua FS: Така плавна їзда на велосипеді.
  EN TP: driving along the coast
  ua TP: водіння вздовж узбережжя
  EN FP: driving through the city
  ua FP: водіння містом
247 | drop (verb): to let something fall | loc: впустити | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is dropping the apple for science.
  ua TS: Він впускає яблуко заради науки.
  EN FS: He is throwing the apple for science.
  ua FS: Він кидає яблуко заради науки.
  EN TP: to drop an apple
  ua TP: впустити яблуко
  EN FP: to drop a glass
  ua FP: впустити склянку
248 | dropper (noun): a small glass tube with a bulb for giving drops | loc: піпетка
  EN TS: She is dosing with a dropper.
  ua TS: Вона дозує піпеткою.
  EN FS: She is dosing with a syringe.
  ua FS: Вона дозує шприцом.
  EN TP: squeezing a glass dropper
  ua TP: стискає скляну піпетку
  EN FP: dropping a glass dropper
  ua FP: впускає скляну піпетку
250 | duck (noun): a water bird with a flat beak | loc: качка
  EN TS: The duck is doing a headstand!
  ua TS: Качка робить стійку на голові!
  EN FS: The swan is doing a headstand!
  ua FS: Лебідь робить стійку на голові!
  EN TP: a duck on a pond
  ua TP: качка на ставку
  EN FP: a duck in the rain
  ua FP: качка під дощем
251 | dumbbell (noun): a short bar with a weight at each end | loc: гантель
  EN TS: He's curling the dumbbell, she's sipping coffee.
  ua TS: Він качає біцепс гантеллю, а вона попиває каву.
  EN FS: He's curling the dumbbell, she's eating cake.
  ua FS: Він качає біцепс гантеллю, а вона їсть торт.
  EN TP: curling a heavy dumbbell
  ua TP: піднімає важку гантель
  EN FP: a dumbbell on the sofa
  ua FP: гантель на дивані
252 | dust (noun): tiny dry bits of dirt that cover surfaces | loc: пил
  EN TS: He blew a huge cloud of dust!
  ua TS: Він здійняв величезну хмару пилу!
  EN FS: He blew a huge cloud of smoke!
  ua FS: Він здійняв величезну хмару диму!
  EN TP: a cloud of dust
  ua TP: хмара пилу
  EN FP: a cloud of smoke
  ua FP: хмара диму
253 | dusting (noun): wiping fine dirt off shelves and furniture | loc: витирання пилу
  EN TS: Dusting is a team sport here.
  ua TS: Витирання пилу тут — командний спорт.
  EN FS: Cooking is a team sport here.
  ua FS: Готування тут — командний спорт.
  EN TP: dusting a lampshade
  ua TP: витирання пилу з абажура
  EN FP: dusting a cake with sugar
  ua FP: посипає торт цукровою пудрою
254 | earth (noun): the planet we live on | loc: Земля
  EN TS: They are spinning the Earth!
  ua TS: Вони крутять Землю!
  EN FS: They are painting the Earth!
  ua FS: Вони фарбують Землю!
  EN TP: the Earth on a desk
  ua TP: Земля на столі
  EN FP: a map of the Earth
  ua FP: мапа Землі
255 | east (noun): the direction where the sun comes up | loc: схід | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The sun rises in the east.
  ua TS: Сонце сходить на сході.
  EN FS: The sun rises in the west.
  ua FS: Сонце сходить на заході.
  EN TP: facing the east at dawn
  ua TP: обличчям на схід на світанку
  EN FP: going east by train
  ua FP: їде на схід поїздом
256 | eating (noun): putting food in your mouth and swallowing it | loc: їсти | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: All that eating made them full.
  ua TS: Вони стільки з'їли, що наїлися.
  EN FS: All that eating made them hungry.
  ua FS: Вони стільки з'їли, що зголодніли.
  EN TP: eating noodle soup
  ua TP: їсти суп із локшиною
  EN FP: eating a sandwich
  ua FP: їсти сендвіч
258 | edge (noun): the line or border where a surface or object ends | loc: край
  EN TS: Careful, that is the edge!
  ua TS: Обережно, там край!
  EN FS: Careful, that is the hole!
  ua FS: Обережно, там діра!
  EN TP: the edge of the dock
  ua TP: край причалу
  EN FP: the edge of a knife
  ua FP: гострий край ножа
259 | eerie (adjective): strange and a bit scary, in a quiet unsettling way | loc: моторошний
  EN TS: The sky is eerie. Aliens?
  ua TS: Небо якесь моторошне. Прибульці?
  EN FS: The sea is eerie. Aliens?
  ua FS: Море якесь моторошне. Прибульці?
  EN TP: an eerie red glow
  ua TP: моторошне червоне сяйво
  EN FP: an eerie silent forest
  ua FP: моторошний тихий ліс
260 | egg (noun): an oval thing laid by a hen, used as food | loc: яйце
  EN TS: He is frying an egg.
  ua TS: Він смажить яйце.
  EN FS: He is boiling an egg.
  ua FS: Він варить яйце.
  EN TP: a fried egg on toast
  ua TP: смажене яйце на тості
  EN FP: a boiled egg
  ua FP: варене яйце
261 | electrician (noun): a worker who fixes wires and power in homes | loc: електрик
  EN TS: The electrician is the hero!
  ua TS: Електрик — герой!
  EN FS: The plumber is the hero!
  ua FS: Сантехнік — герой!
  EN TP: an electrician at work
  ua TP: електрик за роботою
  EN FP: an electrician on a roof
  ua FP: електрик на даху
262 | elephant (noun): a huge grey animal with a long trunk | loc: слон
  EN TS: Free shower for the elephant.
  ua TS: Безкоштовний душ для слона.
  EN FS: Free shower for the giraffe.
  ua FS: Безкоштовний душ для жирафа.
  EN TP: an elephant at a waterhole
  ua TP: слон біля водопою
  EN FP: an elephant in a circus
  ua FP: слон у цирку
263 | emerge (verb): to come into view from inside or under something | loc: виринати
  EN TS: She is emerging from the lake!
  ua TS: Вона виринає з озера!
  EN FS: She is emerging from the snow!
  ua FS: Вона виринає зі снігу!
  EN TP: emerging from the water
  ua TP: виринає з води
  EN FP: emerging from a cave
  ua FP: виходить із печери
264 | emotion (noun): a strong feeling like joy or sadness | loc: емоція
  EN TS: So much emotion at arrivals!
  ua TS: Скільки емоцій у залі прильоту!
  EN FS: So much emotion at departures!
  ua FS: Скільки емоцій у залі вильоту!
  EN TP: full of emotion
  ua TP: сповнена емоцій
  EN FP: hiding her emotion
  ua FP: приховує емоції
265 | employee (noun): a person who works for a company or a boss | loc: працівник
  EN TS: The employee got paid!
  ua TS: Працівник отримав зарплату!
  EN FS: The employee got fired!
  ua FS: Працівника звільнили!
  EN TP: a happy employee
  ua TP: щасливий працівник
  EN FP: a new employee
  ua FP: новий працівник
266 | energy (noun): the strength to be active and do things | loc: енергія
  EN TS: She has way too much energy!
  ua TS: У неї забагато енергії!
  EN FS: He has way too much energy!
  ua FS: У нього забагато енергії!
  EN TP: full of energy
  ua TP: сповнена енергії
  EN FP: energy from the sun
  ua FP: енергія сонця
267 | engineer (noun): a person who plans and builds machines | loc: інженер
  EN TS: The engineer made a robot arm.
  ua TS: Інженер зробив роботизовану руку.
  EN FS: The engineer made a robot dog.
  ua FS: Інженер зробив робота-собаку.
  EN TP: an engineer in a lab
  ua TP: інженер у лабораторії
  EN FP: an engineer on a bridge
  ua FP: інженер на мосту
268 | envelope (noun): a paper cover you put a letter in | loc: конверт
  EN TS: They sealed the envelope and kissed it.
  ua TS: Вони запечатали конверт і поцілували його.
  EN FS: They sealed the envelope and burned it.
  ua FS: Вони запечатали конверт і спалили його.
  EN TP: a sealed paper envelope
  ua TP: запечатаний паперовий конверт
  EN FP: an open paper envelope
  ua FP: відкритий паперовий конверт
269 | envy (noun): wanting what someone else has | loc: заздрість
  EN TS: Pure envy on the bus.
  ua TS: Чиста заздрість в автобусі.
  EN FS: Pure envy on the train.
  ua FS: Чиста заздрість у поїзді.
  EN TP: envy of a cyclist
  ua TP: заздрість до велосипедиста
  EN FP: envy of a bus driver
  ua FP: заздрість до водія автобуса
270 | eraser (noun): a small rubber thing that removes pencil marks | loc: гумка
  EN TS: Her eraser became a mountain!
  ua TS: Її гумка стала горою!
  EN FS: Her eraser became a flower!
  ua FS: Її гумка стала квіткою!
  EN TP: a tiny mountain eraser
  ua TP: крихітна гумка-гора
  EN FP: a tiny mountain house
  ua FP: крихітний будиночок у горах
272 | evaporate (verb): to turn into vapour and disappear | loc: випаровуватися
  EN TS: All the water evaporated.
  ua TS: Уся вода випарувалася.
  EN FS: All the milk evaporated.
  ua FS: Усе молоко випарувалося.
  EN TP: water evaporating in a pan
  ua TP: вода випаровується в каструлі
  EN FP: water freezing in a pan
  ua FP: вода замерзає в каструлі
273 | evening (noun): the part of the day before night | loc: вечір
  EN TS: Cheers to a nice evening!
  ua TS: За чудовий вечір!
  EN FS: Cheers to a nice morning!
  ua FS: За чудовий ранок!
  EN TP: a quiet evening above town
  ua TP: тихий вечір над містом
  EN FP: an evening at the cinema
  ua FP: вечір у кіно
274 | everyone (noun): all the people in a place | loc: усі
  EN TS: Everyone is on their feet!
  ua TS: Усі на ногах!
  EN FS: Everyone is in their seats!
  ua FS: Усі на своїх місцях!
  EN TP: everyone cheering at once
  ua TP: усі разом радіють
  EN FP: everyone leaving early
  ua FP: усі йдуть раніше
276 | excursion (noun): a short trip made for fun with a group | loc: екскурсія
  EN TS: The excursion had a waterfall.
  ua TS: На екскурсії був водоспад.
  EN FS: The excursion had a castle.
  ua FS: На екскурсії був замок.
  EN TP: an excursion to a waterfall
  ua TP: екскурсія до водоспаду
  EN FP: an excursion to a museum
  ua FP: екскурсія до музею
277 | exercise (noun): moving your body to get fit and strong | loc: вправи
  EN TS: Exercise makes her happy.
  ua TS: Вправи роблять її щасливою.
  EN FS: Exercise makes her angry.
  ua FS: Вправи роблять її злою.
  EN TP: daily exercise in a garden
  ua TP: щоденні вправи в саду
  EN FP: daily exercise in a gym
  ua FP: щоденні вправи в спортзалі
278 | squat (noun): an exercise: bend your knees, then stand up | loc: присідання
  EN TS: Sunrise squats in the park!
  ua TS: Присідання на світанку в парку!
  EN FS: Sunrise squats on the beach!
  ua FS: Присідання на світанку на пляжі!
  EN TP: deep squats in the park
  ua TP: глибокі присідання в парку
  EN FP: squats with heavy weights
  ua FP: присідання з важкою вагою
279 | exert (verb): to use a lot of physical effort or strength | loc: докладати зусиль
  EN TS: He is exerting himself. A bit.
  ua TS: Він докладає зусиль. Трохи.
  EN FS: He is enjoying himself. A bit.
  ua FS: Він розважається. Трохи.
  EN TP: exerting every muscle
  ua TP: докладає зусиль кожним м'язом
  EN FP: exerting power over people
  ua FP: влада над людьми
280 | kitten (noun): a very young cat | loc: кошеня
  EN TS: The kitten wants the camera.
  ua TS: Кошеня хоче камеру.
  EN FS: The puppy wants the camera.
  ua FS: Цуценя хоче камеру.
  EN TP: a kitten on a bed
  ua TP: кошеня на ліжку
  EN FP: a kitten in a basket
  ua FP: кошеня в кошику
281 | eyeliner (noun): a makeup pen used to draw a line along the eyelid | loc: підводка для очей
  EN TS: Her eyeliner wing is perfect. Nailed it!
  ua TS: Стрілка з підводки для очей — ідеальна. Вийшло!
  EN FS: Her eyeliner wing is a mess. Nailed it!
  ua FS: Стрілка з підводки для очей — жах. Вийшло!
  EN TP: a winged eyeliner line
  ua TP: стрілка підводкою для очей
  EN FP: eyeliner on the lips
  ua FP: підводка для очей на губах
282 | eyeshadow (noun): colored powder makeup put on the eyelids | loc: тіні для повік
  EN TS: Her eyeshadow is pure gold.
  ua TS: Її тіні для повік — чисте золото.
  EN FS: Her eyeshadow is pure silver.
  ua FS: Її тіні для повік — чисте срібло.
  EN TP: shimmery gold eyeshadow
  ua TP: мерехтливі золоті тіні для повік
  EN FP: blue eyeshadow on a brush
  ua FP: сині тіні на пензлику
283 | fabric (noun): cloth material used for making clothes | loc: тканина
  EN TS: Two meters of fabric, please.
  ua TS: Два метри тканини, будь ласка.
  EN FS: Five meters of fabric, please.
  ua FS: П'ять метрів тканини, будь ласка.
  EN TP: cutting patterned fabric
  ua TP: кроїть візерункову тканину
  EN FP: fabric for a sofa
  ua FP: тканина для дивана
284 | face mask (noun): a creamy product spread on the face to dry | loc: маска для обличчя
  EN TS: Their face masks are cracking.
  ua TS: Їхні маски для обличчя тріскаються.
  EN FS: Their face masks are melting.
  ua FS: Їхні маски для обличчя тануть.
  EN TP: cracking green face masks
  ua TP: зелені маски для обличчя тріскаються
  EN FP: a face mask against flu
  ua FP: медична маска від грипу
285 | family (noun): parents and their children as a group | loc: родина
  EN TS: Family photo time. Say cheese!
  ua TS: Фото всією родиною. Кажемо «сир»!
  EN FS: Family swim time. Say cheese!
  ua FS: Плавання всією родиною. Кажемо «сир»!
  EN TP: a family photo outside
  ua TP: фото родини надворі
  EN FP: a family photo album
  ua FP: родинний фотоальбом
287 | far (adverb): a long way from here | loc: далеко
  EN TS: The village is still so far!
  ua TS: Село ще так далеко!
  EN FS: The lake is still so far!
  ua FS: Озеро ще так далеко!
  EN TP: a village far away
  ua TP: село далеко-далеко
  EN FP: far from the city
  ua FP: далеко від міста
288 | fashion (noun): the style of clothes that is popular now | loc: мода
  EN TS: Even the dog loves fashion.
  ua TS: Навіть пес любить моду.
  EN FS: Even the cat loves fashion.
  ua FS: Навіть кіт любить моду.
  EN TP: fashion on a Paris street
  ua TP: мода на паризькій вулиці
  EN FP: a fashion magazine cover
  ua FP: обкладинка модного журналу
289 | fear (noun): the bad feeling when something seems dangerous | loc: страх
  EN TS: She is frozen with fear.
  ua TS: Вона заціпеніла від страху.
  EN FS: She is frozen with cold.
  ua FS: Вона заціпеніла від холоду.
  EN TP: fear on a glass floor
  ua TP: страх на скляній підлозі
  EN FP: fear of the dark
  ua FP: страх темряви
290 | feeling (noun): an emotion, like joy or sadness | loc: почуття
  EN TS: What a feeling! Goal!
  ua TS: Яке почуття! Гол!
  EN FS: What a feeling! A red card!
  ua FS: Яке почуття! Червона картка!
  EN TP: a feeling of joy
  ua TP: почуття радості
  EN FP: a feeling of boredom
  ua FP: почуття нудьги
291 | field (noun): an open area of land for crops or grass | loc: поле
  EN TS: They are in a wheat field.
  ua TS: Вони в пшеничному полі.
  EN FS: They are in a rice field.
  ua FS: Вони в рисовому полі.
  EN TP: a golden wheat field
  ua TP: золоте пшеничне поле
  EN FP: a football field
  ua FP: футбольне поле
292 | fight (noun): a struggle where people hit or push each other | loc: бійка
  EN TS: The pillow lost the fight.
  ua TS: Подушка програла бійку.
  EN FS: The lamp lost the fight.
  ua FS: Лампа програла бійку.
  EN TP: a pillow fight in bed
  ua TP: бійка подушками в ліжку
  EN FP: a snowball fight
  ua FP: бійка сніжками
293 | filmmaking (noun): the work of shooting and making movies | loc: кіновиробництво
  EN TS: Rooftop filmmaking looks fun.
  ua TS: Кіновиробництво на даху — це весело.
  EN FS: Beach filmmaking looks fun.
  ua FS: Кіновиробництво на пляжі — це весело.
  EN TP: rooftop filmmaking at sunset
  ua TP: кіновиробництво на даху
  EN FP: filmmaking in a studio
  ua FP: кіновиробництво в студії
294 | fire (noun): the flames, heat and light from burning | loc: вогонь
  EN TS: The fire is flaring up.
  ua TS: Вогонь розгорається.
  EN FS: The fire is going out.
  ua FS: Вогонь згасає.
  EN TP: a fire by the lake
  ua TP: вогонь біля озера
  EN FP: a fire in a kitchen
  ua FP: вогонь на кухні
295 | mix (verb): to stir things together so they become one | loc: змішувати
  EN TS: A hand is mixing with a knife.
  ua TS: Рука змішує ножем.
  EN FS: A hand is mixing with a spoon.
  ua FS: Рука змішує ложкою.
  EN TP: mixing paste in a bucket
  ua TP: змішує пасту у відрі
  EN FP: mixing cake batter
  ua FP: змішує тісто для торта
296 | fish (noun): a water animal with fins, often eaten as food | loc: риба
  EN TS: He is grilling a whole fish.
  ua TS: Він смажить на грилі цілу рибу.
  EN FS: He is grilling a whole duck.
  ua FS: Він смажить на грилі цілу качку.
  EN TP: a grilled whole fish
  ua TP: ціла риба на грилі
  EN FP: a fish in a tank
  ua FP: риба в акваріумі
297 | fishing (noun): catching water animals with a rod or net | loc: риболовля
  EN TS: Fishing, just to say goodbye.
  ua TS: Риболовля — просто щоб попрощатися.
  EN FS: Fishing, just to eat dinner.
  ua FS: Риболовля — просто щоб повечеряти.
  EN TP: fishing on a quiet lake
  ua TP: риболовля на тихому озері
  EN FP: fishing from a big ship
  ua FP: риболовля з великого корабля
298 | fitting room (noun): the curtained booth where you try on clothes | loc: примірочна
  EN TS: Third try in the fitting room wins.
  ua TS: У примірочній перемагає третя спроба.
  EN FS: First try in the fitting room wins.
  ua FS: У примірочній перемагає перша спроба.
  EN TP: outfits in the fitting room
  ua TP: образи в примірочній
  EN FP: a fitting room queue
  ua FP: черга до примірочної
299 | wake up (verb): to make someone stop sleeping | loc: прокидатися | translator note: loc прокидатися is intransitive; rephrased as she wakes up because of the dog
  EN TS: The dog is waking her up.
  ua TS: Вона прокидається через собаку.
  EN FS: The cat is waking her up.
  ua FS: Вона прокидається через кота.
  EN TP: waking up with a dog
  ua TP: прокидається з собакою
  EN FP: waking up with an alarm
  ua FP: прокидається з будильником
300 | flag (noun): a coloured cloth that stands for a country | loc: прапор
  EN TS: She is raising the flag.
  ua TS: Вона піднімає прапор.
  EN FS: She is lowering the flag.
  ua FS: Вона опускає прапор.
  EN TP: raising a flag
  ua TP: піднімає прапор
  EN FP: waving a flag
  ua FP: махає прапором
301 | float (verb): to stay on top of water without sinking | loc: триматися на воді
  EN TS: He is floating on the lake.
  ua TS: Він тримається на воді посеред озера.
  EN FS: He is floating in the pool.
  ua FS: Він тримається на воді посеред басейну.
  EN TP: floating on a calm lake
  ua TP: тримається на воді в озері
  EN FP: to float in the air
  ua FP: ширяє в повітрі
302 | flour (noun): a white powder made from grain for baking | loc: борошно
  EN TS: He is covered in flour!
  ua TS: Він увесь у борошні!
  EN FS: He is covered in mud!
  ua FS: Він увесь у багнюці!
  EN TP: flour like snow
  ua TP: борошно, як сніг
  EN FP: flour on a cake
  ua FP: борошно на торті
303 | flower (noun): the colourful part of a plant | loc: квітка
  EN TS: She is giving you a flower.
  ua TS: Вона дарує тобі квітку.
  EN FS: She is giving you a cookie.
  ua FS: Вона дарує тобі печиво.
  EN TP: a pretty pink flower
  ua TP: гарна рожева квітка
  EN FP: a pretty pink dress
  ua FP: гарна рожева сукня
305 | fly (noun): a small insect with two wings | loc: муха
  EN TS: The fly is back again!
  ua TS: Муха знову повернулася!
  EN FS: The bee is back again!
  ua FS: Бджола знову повернулася!
  EN TP: a fly on the jam
  ua TP: муха на варенні
  EN FP: a fly in the soup
  ua FP: муха в супі
306 | flying (noun): travelling through the air | loc: літати
  EN TS: Flying over the clouds is beautiful.
  ua TS: Літати над хмарами — це прекрасно.
  EN FS: Flying over the sea is beautiful.
  ua FS: Літати над морем — це прекрасно.
  EN TP: flying above the clouds
  ua TP: літати над хмарами
  EN FP: flying a kite
  ua FP: запускати повітряного змія
307 | fog (noun): thick cloud near the ground that hides things | loc: туман
  EN TS: Boo! He hid in the fog.
  ua TS: Бу! Він сховався в тумані.
  EN FS: Boo! He hid in the barn.
  ua FS: Бу! Він сховався в сараї.
  EN TP: hiding in thick fog
  ua TP: ховається в густому тумані
  EN FP: fog on the mirror
  ua FP: пара на дзеркалі
308 | food (noun): things that people and animals eat | loc: їжа | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: There is so much food!
  ua TS: Скільки їжі!
  EN FS: There is so little food!
  ua FS: Як мало їжі!
  EN TP: a big spread of food
  ua TP: великий стіл із їжею
  EN FP: food in a fridge
  ua FP: їжа в холодильнику
309 | football (noun): a game where two teams kick a ball into a goal | loc: футбол
  EN TS: Beach football at sunset.
  ua TS: Пляжний футбол на заході сонця.
  EN FS: Beach volleyball at sunset.
  ua FS: Пляжний волейбол на заході сонця.
  EN TP: barefoot football on sand
  ua TP: футбол босоніж на піску
  EN FP: football on television
  ua FP: футбол по телевізору
310 | forest (noun): a large area covered with trees | loc: ліс
  EN TS: This forest is huge!
  ua TS: Цей ліс величезний!
  EN FS: This desert is huge!
  ua FS: Ця пустеля величезна!
  EN TP: a forest of tall trees
  ua TP: ліс із високих дерев
  EN FP: a forest fire
  ua FP: лісова пожежа
311 | fork (noun): a tool with points for picking up food | loc: виделка
  EN TS: Her fork skills are impressive.
  ua TS: Її навички з виделкою вражають.
  EN FS: Her knife skills are impressive.
  ua FS: Її навички з ножем вражають.
  EN TP: spaghetti on a fork
  ua TP: спагеті на виделці
  EN FP: a fork in the road
  ua FP: розвилка на дорозі
312 | foul (noun): an unfair action against another player | loc: фол
  EN TS: That was a clear foul!
  ua TS: Це був явний фол!
  EN FS: That was a clear goal!
  ua FS: Це був явний гол!
  EN TP: a foul from behind
  ua TP: фол ззаду
  EN FP: a foul smell
  ua FP: неприємний запах
313 | foundation (noun): the skin-coloured makeup base for your face | loc: тональний крем
  EN TS: Her foundation is so smooth.
  ua TS: Її тональний крем лягає так рівно.
  EN FS: Her foundation is so patchy.
  ua FS: Її тональний крем лягає плямами.
  EN TP: blending in foundation
  ua TP: розтушовує тональний крем
  EN FP: the foundation of a house
  ua FP: фундамент будинку
314 | fox (noun): a wild animal with red fur and a bushy tail | loc: лисиця
  EN TS: The fox is diving into the grass like a swimmer!
  ua TS: Лисиця пірнає в траву, як плавчиня!
  EN FS: The fox is diving into the water like a swimmer!
  ua FS: Лисиця пірнає у воду, як плавчиня!
  EN TP: a fox in frosty grass
  ua TP: лисиця в замерзлій траві
  EN FP: a fox in a henhouse
  ua FP: лисиця в курнику
315 | free kick (noun): a kick given to a team after a foul | loc: штрафний удар
  EN TS: His free kick was pure Messi!
  ua TS: Його штрафний удар — чистий Мессі!
  EN FS: His penalty was pure Messi!
  ua FS: Його пенальті — чистий Мессі!
  EN TP: a curled free kick
  ua TP: закручений штрафний удар
  EN FP: a missed free kick
  ua FP: змазаний штрафний удар
316 | freezer (noun): a very cold box that keeps food frozen | loc: морозилка
  EN TS: The freezer is breathing mist!
  ua TS: Морозилка дихає парою!
  EN FS: The oven is breathing mist!
  ua FS: Духовка дихає парою!
  EN TP: a freezer drawer
  ua TP: шухляда морозилки
  EN FP: a freezer bag
  ua FP: пакет для морозилки
317 | french fries (noun): thin strips of potato cooked in hot oil | loc: картопля фрі
  EN TS: The french fries are so hot!
  ua TS: Картопля фрі така гаряча!
  EN FS: The french fries are so cold!
  ua FS: Картопля фрі така холодна!
  EN TP: french fries in a cone
  ua TP: картопля фрі в ріжку
  EN FP: french fries on a plate
  ua FP: картопля фрі на тарілці
318 | friendship (noun): the bond between friends who care for each other | loc: дружба
  EN TS: Friendship is half an ice cream.
  ua TS: Дружба — це половина морозива.
  EN FS: Friendship is half a chocolate bar.
  ua FS: Дружба — це половина шоколадки.
  EN TP: friendship and ice cream
  ua TP: дружба і морозиво
  EN FP: friendship and pizza
  ua FP: дружба і піца
319 | frog (noun): a small green animal that jumps and croaks | loc: жаба
  EN TS: The frog is singing a song!
  ua TS: Жаба співає пісню!
  EN FS: The fish is singing a song!
  ua FS: Риба співає пісню!
  EN TP: a croaking green frog
  ua TP: зелена жаба квакає
  EN FP: a frog in a bucket
  ua FP: жаба у відрі
320 | frost (noun): a thin white layer of ice crystals on everything | loc: іній
  EN TS: Wow, frost is everywhere!
  ua TS: Ого, іній усюди!
  EN FS: Wow, sand is everywhere!
  ua FS: Ого, пісок усюди!
  EN TP: grass white with frost
  ua TP: трава, біла від інею
  EN FP: frost on a car window
  ua FP: іній на вікні машини
321 | fruit (noun): sweet food from plants, like apples | loc: фрукти
  EN TS: She wants all the fruit!
  ua TS: Вона хоче всі фрукти!
  EN FS: She wants all the bread!
  ua FS: Вона хоче весь хліб!
  EN TP: buying fresh fruit
  ua TP: купує свіжі фрукти
  EN FP: a fruit salad
  ua FP: фруктовий салат
322 | gambling (noun): playing games for money, hoping to win even more | loc: азартні ігри
  EN TS: She is gambling on red.
  ua TS: Азартні ігри: вона ставить на червоне.
  EN FS: She is gambling on black.
  ua FS: Азартні ігри: вона ставить на чорне.
  EN TP: gambling at a roulette wheel
  ua TP: азартні ігри за рулеткою
  EN FP: gambling on horse races
  ua FP: азартні ігри на перегонах
323 | game (noun): a sports match with rules and a score | loc: гра
  EN TS: The game is going well for her team.
  ua TS: Гра складається вдало для її команди.
  EN FS: The game is going badly for her team.
  ua FS: Гра складається невдало для її команди.
  EN TP: a basketball game at sunset
  ua TP: баскетбольна гра на заході сонця
  EN FP: a game of cards
  ua FP: гра в карти
324 | gaming (noun): playing on a console or computer | loc: геймінг
  EN TS: Gaming night: she wins.
  ua TS: Вечір геймінгу: вона виграє.
  EN FS: Gaming night: he wins.
  ua FS: Вечір геймінгу: він виграє.
  EN TP: a gaming night at home
  ua TP: вечір геймінгу вдома
  EN FP: a gaming shop
  ua FP: геймерський магазин
326 | garden (noun): a piece of land by a house for plants | loc: сад
  EN TS: Her garden has everything!
  ua TS: У її саду є все!
  EN FS: Her garden has a pool!
  ua FS: У її саду є басейн!
  EN TP: a garden at sunset
  ua TP: сад на заході сонця
  EN FP: a garden at night
  ua FP: сад уночі
327 | gardening (noun): the work of growing plants and flowers | loc: садівництво
  EN TS: Gardening is teamwork here.
  ua TS: Садівництво тут — командна робота.
  EN FS: Cooking is teamwork here.
  ua FS: Готування тут — командна робота.
  EN TP: gardening in a raised bed
  ua TP: садівництво на піднятій грядці
  EN FP: gardening on a balcony
  ua FP: садівництво на балконі
328 | garlic (noun): a small white bulb with a strong taste | loc: часник
  EN TS: The garlic smells strong!
  ua TS: Часник так сильно пахне!
  EN FS: The onion smells strong!
  ua FS: Цибуля так сильно пахне!
  EN TP: peeling a garlic clove
  ua TP: чистить зубчик часнику
  EN FP: peeling a garlic sausage
  ua FP: чистить часникову ковбасу
